Authors
DeWyNGaLe
Number of Reviews
55

Title
Review for Carrie (1976)
The other night, I made one of the biggest mistakes I have made relating to
movies ever.  I viewed The Rage: Carrie 2, without even seeing the original. 
My original rating for The Rage: Carrie 2 was an A-, but now after seeing this
smart masterpiece, I give it a C+.  The plot lines between the two films are
very similar, but in Carrie, I felt for the character a lot more.  Sissy Spacek
plays Carrie, the high school outcast.  Throughout the film, she is tortured
because she is shy and not with the in crowd.  Carrie has a very unique talent.
 She can move things with her mind.  She researches the subject to see what is
happening, and she learns she has telekinesis, the power to move things with
your mind.  Her mother, played by Piper Laurie, is convinced that the devil is
in her, but Carrie knows the truth.  Some of her tormentors include Sue Snell,
played by Amy Irving, Billy Nolan, played by John Travolta, and Chris
Hargenson, played by Nancy Allen.  They feel no sympathy for Carrie at all. 
The teachers do not like Carrie either.  They also make fun of her.  There is
one teacher though who does care about Carrie.  Her name is Miss Collins, and
she is played by Betty Buckley.  She punishes those who torment Carrie, but in
the end, even Miss Collins turns her back on Carrie.
Tommy Ross, played by William Katt, is one of the most popular boys in the
school.  He is asked by Sue to ask Carrie to the prom, to make Carrie feel
better about herself.  He asks, and Carrie declines.  He keeps on asking Carrie
though, and she finally gives in.  Now, Carrie must go through her mother,
Margaret, played by Piper Laurie, who thinks of going to the prom as a sin. 
Her mother thinks of almost everything as a sin.  She is a very religious
person, and therefore Carrie is not allowed to do much outside the house.  When
Margaret believes Carrie is acting up, she will put her in the closet and lock
her in there.  Her mother is just one more person who torments her.  After
demanding she is going to the prom, Carrie goes.
At the prom, no one can believe that Tommy Ross and Carrie are together. 
Carrie is actually enjoying herself for once in her life.  After winning prom
queen, Carrie thinks she has it made.  Then, something terrible happens which
destroys her night.  The in-crowd has setup Carrie in an awful prank to make
her feel horrible about herself.  Nobody knows that Carrie has the power to
shut them up from laughing at her withing seconds.  They certainly do after she
uses her telekinetic powers to get revenge on everyone at the prom, resulting
in many deaths.  The prom sequence was very effective and moving.  Watching
Carrie watch her other classmates die was very difficult.  You could tell that
she was very mad, but she was also upset with what she was doing to all of her
fellow classmates.  That night, she killed many innocent people, people who
didn't even make fun of her.  She did get her long awaited revenge though.  
Sissy Spacek was so exquisite as the role of Carrie.  She played the part where
you felt feelings for Carrie, and almost just wanted to break down and cry when
seeing her upset face.  It is beyond me why Spacek did not win the Oscar for
Best Actress in 1976, considering she gave one of the best performances I have
ever witnessed in my movie-going.  Piper Laurie, as Carrie's mother, was a very
interesting role to watch.  She played the part almost perfectly, creating the
feel of a strong, religious person very well. 
The in-crowd was played almost to perfection by the large cast, and although
the characters were extremely repugnant, they were played very proficiently. 
Amy Irving as Sue Snell perhaps gave the best performance out of the crowd. 
The entire in-crowd were quite possibly some of the most frustrating characters
I have ever come across in a movie.  Carrie was such a nice, sweet girl, and
they tortured her with all of their might.
The Bottom Line- Without a doubt, Carrie is one of the best horror films of our
time.

Title
Review for In Dreams (1999)
Lately, many horror movies have been released.  They are all the same-
predictable and gory.  In Dreams is a very different horror movie that doesn't
rely on blood and gore to make it scary.  Annette Bening stars as Claire
Cooper, a wife and mother.  Her husband is Paul Cooper, played by Aidan Quinn. 
Her daughter, Rebecca, played by Katie Sagona is happy.  The three of them live
in a big house, have a housekeeper, and are truly happy.  There is something
keeping Claire from happiness though.  Terrible things, things that she can't
explain.  All her life, she has had dreams of children dying.  She has a
psychological link to a serial killer.  No one believes her, but she knows she
isn't psychotic.
Rebecca stars as the mirror in her school play of Snow White.  She has been
rehearsing her one line over and over again.  Earlier on in the day, Claire had
visions of a little girl being led through an apple orchard by a man.  She
suspects this is the child that has been missing for some days now.  When she
finds out that the remains of the girl were found far from an apple orchard,
she is extremely confused.  Rebecca gets the line perfect in the play, and her
mother and father are very proud.  After the play, all of the kids involved
socialize for a while.  When Claire comes to pick up Rebecca, Rebecca is not
there.  The police are out searching everywhere, but she is nowhere to be
found.  The next day, the remains of Rebecca Cooper are found.  Claire is now
starting to wonder if she is seeing the future of what this brutal killer is
going to do.
She has more visions of what this man is going to do, and tries to inform the
police and her husband about what is going to happen next, but no one believes
her.  She is admitted to a mental home now.  Her psychiatrist doesn't even
believe what she is saying.  The thing is, Claire isn't crazy.  She knows what
she is talking about.  She finds out in her room that the man's name is Vivian
Thompson.  A creepy phrase is written all over the walls- MY DADDY WAS A
DOLLAR.  It continues on and on.  I have chills just thinking of this
terrifying scene.  She tries her best to find Vivian now and see what it is
that he wants.  She escapes from the mental home to track down Vivian.  When
she finally finds Vivian it is not a pretty sight.  One of the creepiest scenes
in any movie I have ever seen follows when she meets Vivian for the first time.
 An ending scene keeps you guessing and on the edge of your seat.  What
happens?  I am afraid you will have to see In Dreams for yourself to find out. 
In Dreams is the scariest, creepiest, eeriest film in a long, long time.  It is
almost impossible to tell what is going to happen in her dreams, and what is
going to happen in real life.  Everything is explained extremely well, and it
was easy to understand what was going on.  There is hardly any blood and gore
in In Dreams, and this just proves you don't need the blood and gore to make a
good scary movie.  Teen audiences will trash this film because of the cast and
the fact that it isn't a trashy slasher movie.  Every scene is packed with
action, the film never slows down.  It keeps your attention extremely well. 
The film was very disturbing as well.  Some of the images and sounds will stick
with me throughout the movie year of 1999.
Annette Bening delivers a wonderful performance as she makes you believe the
pain that Claire is going through.  At times, she overacted a little bit, but
that doesn't take away from her outstanding performance.  Aidan Quinn gives a
great follow up to his role in October's Practical Magic with Sandra Bullock
and Nicole Kidman.  He should get many more roles as the year goes on.  Robert
Downey Jr. is very mysterious and creepy.  He makes the role of Vivian Thompson
interesting, but at the same time extremely scary.  In Dreams is up there with
Scream and I Know What You Did Last Summer.  It may be a different type of
film, but it is just as scary as Scream.  
The Bottom Line- In Dreams will be in my dreams for a while.

Title
Review for Instinct (1999)
INSTINCT by John Sylva (DewyNGale@aol.com)    Rating: C+
http://members.aol.com/DeWyNGaLe
Anthony Hopkins could very well be the greatest actor alive today.  Cuba
Gooding Jr. could very well be the greatest young actor alive today.  What
happens when you mix then in a film similar to one of Hopkins' classics,
Silence of the Lambs?
Primatologist Ethan Powell, played by Anthony Hopkins, has an obsession with
the species of gorilla.  For a long time, Ethan lived with gorillas in the
forests of Africa, abandoning his wife and daughter Lynn, played by Maura
Tierney, taking on their behavior, becoming a part of their family.  After
being found, Powell is accused of clubbing two park rangers to death, but he
chooses to remain silent at all times, so therefore he cannot represent himself
in court to defend himself.  To try to break the barrier, to try and regain the
person that Dr. Powell once was, psychiatrist Theo Caulder, played by Cuba
Gooding Jr. is sent in to try to put an end to the mystery.
As Theo continues to meet with the strange man, he starts to unravel the
mystery behind him.  During every visitation between the two, Theo unlocks
another secret that start to lead to the question- Is this man really that bad?
 The two start to become friends of sorts, speaking frequently.  Unfortunately,
to Lynn's dismay, Ethan refuses to discuss her, and when her name comes up he
becomes very angry.  Theo is now not only meeting with his main focus, but
other patients at the high security Florida prison.  The film goes off into a
sub-plot about morals, and treating people right, especially in prison.  I
would have liked it if the writers stuck with the main plot, and not gone off
with a much seen plot. 
Cuba Gooding Jr. is exceeding any past performance of his in Instinct, but
unfortunately, the rest of the cast, plot, and the poor directing by John
Turteltaub do not live up to the astonishing performance that he put forward. 
Believe it or not, Anthony Hopkins actually didn't do all that admirable at his
underwritten role.  Maybe if the screenplay writer, Gerald Di Pego, had done
more with Dr. Ethan Powell than have him sit there and say a word here and
there, Anthony Hopkins could have given a much more commendable performance.
Instinct frustrated me with all of my might.  It is one of those films that is
like a go-cart.  It gets going, and then it stops.  It slowly gains speed, only
to be shut down once again.  Instinct is the exact same way.  The perfect time
to set off something happens all over the place, but nothing happens, except
for the scenes comes to and end.  Because of this, Instinct never really went
anywhere.  It ended up being more of a history book than a movie.  The moral of
the story was an exceptionally brilliant one, but it has been used so many
times in other movies, the repetitiveness is getting annoying.  Yes, we know by
know, Hollywood, that killing animals and judging people is wrong.  Can't we
move on?  I'm not saying this movie is bad for this repetitive moral, I am just
saying that filmmakers today should move on to bigger and better things.   The
plot and characters barely develop, and barely anything is accomplished during
the entire film.
When going into Instinct, I expected a thrilling, exciting film with starring
two of today's greatest actors.  Instead of that, I got a slow drama, copying
off of many past films, trying to mix Silence of the Lambs with Patch Adams,
and excluding Cuba Gooding Jr., the actors seemed like copycats trying to act
like the actors.  Is this because of the poor writing and directing, or are
these actors really running out of steam?  Director Turteltaub tries to use the
same sort of style he did in the wonderful film Phenomenon, where everything
came pretty slow, and ended up in something great, but in Instinct, it doesn't
really end up anywhere.
The Bottom Line- Cuba Gooding Jr. and Anthony Hopkins should have used their
instincts, and stayed away from this poorly written drama.

Title
Review for Go (1999)
http://members.aol.com/DeWyNGaLe
Almost every weekend now, teen movies are released.  Most of them are mediocre,
such as Ten Things I Hate About You (C+) and Wing Commander (F), but some of
them are very well done, such as Cruel Intentions (A-), Never Been Kissed (A),
and this film.  Once in awhile, just like in this film's case, the film will be
much more than an attempt to bring in money from teenagers.  They will appeal
to not only teens, but adults as well.  That's that way I feel about the film
Go.  This film is from the director Doug Liman, who also directed the hit movie
Swingers, starring Vince Vaughn.  
The film is actually three short films in one.  Each section follows a
different character and what they do on Christmas Eve.  In most cases, drugs
are the main idea.  The first section of the film is entitled "Ronna."  Sarah
Polley stars as Ronna, a rude grocery store worker.  There, she hangs out with
Claire, played by Katie Holmes, Mannie, played by Nathan Bexton, and Simon,
played by Desmond Askew.  All three are really into drugs.  At the grocery
store, two men (Jay Mohr and Scott Wolf) make a drug deal with Ronna.  Ronna
must get the drugs from a dealer, who also deals for Simon.  The dealer is
Todd, played by Scream 2's (A-) Timothy Olyphant.  She is on her way to a
party, where she makes a lot of money selling allergy medicine to pay back drug
debts.  
Ronna's story is a very interesting one.  Ronna is a very confused character. 
Sarah Polley is very good as the character.  The best character in this story
is Claire.  Katie Holmes is absolutely wonderful as Claire.  Holmes will have a
huge career ahead of her after this film.  Mannie and Simon are not the main
focuses in this story, but they will be seen later on.  Timothy Olyphant is
also superb as Todd.  All of the characters seem very realistic and strange in
this part of the film.
The second section is called "Simon."  We know Simon from earlier, in the story
of "Ronna."  Once again, Desmond Askew plays Simon.  Simon's main hobby is
drugs. Right now, he is in Las Vegas with Marcus, played by How Stella Got Her
Groove Back's Taye Diggs, Singh, played by James Duval, and Tiny, played by
Breckin Meyer.  The three get into big trouble in Vegas, and now they are being
chased by two men who are willing to kill them on the spot.
This part of the film was probably the most unlikable.  Simon is not a very
likable character, but what do expect from a drug crazed maniac?   Askew is
fine as the role, it's just the character.  Taye Diggs was good when he was on
screen, but he didn't get half the screen time he needed to develop his
character.  Meyer and Duval are not seen enough to decide whether they turned
in good performances or not.  
The third and final section is called "Adam and Zack."  These two characters
were seen earlier in the film, during one of the first sequences in the grocery
store.  Adam is played by played by Party of Five's Scott Wolf, and Zack is
played by Playing By Heart's Jay Mohr.  The two are soap opera actors.  This
third section of the film was good.  Mohr turns in a type of performance that I
thought he could never pull off- A non-annoying and even good performance. 
Scott Wolf is also good.
The way Go was done was very impressive.  I really enjoyed the technique, and
especially the way everything tied together in the end.  Maybe the makers of
the film 200 Cigarettes (D) should have used this form if film making, rather
than making the film very confusing.
Another thing that I really loved about Go was the amount of sub-plots it had. 
There was no definitive plot, which gives you a variety of different plots that
are all developed very nicely.  The performances turned out by everyone are
good.  Katie Holmes and Timothy Olyphant are the two performances that are
still in my mind though.  They were both very exceptional and a lot more than I
expected.
Go is a very funny film.  It isn't pure comedy though.  There are a lot of
themes, mainly drugs, that are darker and disturbing.  The drug usage plays a
main part in the film, so I don't think younger teens should see this flick. 
Many sequences are hysterical.  Mannie turns out many laughs after taking too
many drugs.  The sound also adds a lot to the content of the film.  The
soundtrack is fun and fast.  A young teen cast, a fresh soundtrack, and the
funny scenes should make this film a cult hit.  It was much like Trainspotting,
(C+) only a lot more light and fun to watch.  Expect wonderful word of mouth
for this great little film.

Title
Review for Election (1999)
http://members.aol.com/DeWyNGaLe
Every school has a student that is an overachiever.  The student strives day
and night to be better than everybody else, including their very own teachers. 
They are a part of every extra curricular activity you could ever imagine. 
Well, at Carver High School, Tracy Flick (Reese Witherspoon) is that student.
At Carver High School, it is time to have the elections for the officers of the
Student Council. Tracy Flick is running for president without anyone running
against her.  Mr. McAllister (Matthew Broderick), Tracy's wonderful teacher,
cannot stand the thought of having Tracy as the President of the Student
Council, so therefore he tries to find others to run against her.  He finds
injured football star Paul Metzler (Chris Klein) to run against her, only
because he has nothing else to do with his life, although he doesn't have any
idea what he is doing.  Deciding to run as well is Paul's younger,
unenthusiastic student Tammy, played by Jessica Campbell.  Tracy is absolutely
infuriated with the other nominees because they are reducing her chances to
win.
The election is only one part of the actual film though.  The second main plot
of the film deals with Mr. McAllister and his confusing, troubled life.  He has
so many different emotions in his head about school, his wife, having children,
cheating on his wife, and Tracy Flick.  This plot is much like what John Cusack
went through in the film Pushing Tin.  It is pretty ugly, un-fun, and
depressing material, but Broderick really shined in it.  Matthew Broderick has
almost completely annoyed me in every film he has ever been a part of, but in
Election, he actually did a wonderful job.  Hopefully, he will stay with the
more serious kind of film from now on.  It would do his career much good if he
got into more films such as Election, rather than terrible films like 1998's
Godzilla.
Reese Witherspoon brilliantly carries the entire weight of the film on her
shoulders.  She is absolutely perfect as Tracy Flick, creating the character in
a three dimensional sense.  This is the third film I have seen Reese in, and I
have loved her performances in all three.  In 1998's Pleasantville, she didn't
get to go very many places with her character, and in 1999's Cruel Intentions,
we didn't get to see her enough, but in Election, she gets to do exactly what
she is capable of doing.  Now I believe that Reese Witherspoon can play anyone
she wants to be.  Her characters are all so much different from each other, it
is amazing that she can play each one of them in a very realistic sense.
When Reese Witherspoon or Matthew Broderick aren't present making the film
great, we get outstanding supporting performances by newcomer Chris Klein and
Jessica Campbell.  Chris Klein's character is totally clueless and very funny,
and his sister is a total sarcastic brat which reminded me of a character from
a television show called "Daria."  I wish that we could have seen more of these
two hysterical characters rather than the depressing plot line of Mr.
McAllister losing everything he has in life. 
Election reminded me much of the 1998 surprise hit, Rushmore.  Tracy and Max
Fischer (played brilliantly by Jason Schwartzman in Rushmore) were both
complete over achievers, and both made me laugh extremely hard.  Tracy is a
very likable and unlikable character at the same time.  At times she can
disgust you with her lowness, and at times she can make you crack up when she
is the only one raising her hand in class all of the time.
Teen comedies have been the "big" thing lately, but I think that Election
really broke through that barrier.  Rather than using the same old jokes or the
same old plots, Election goes with a much more smart, original theme.  The type
of humor in Election is starting to be used more widely, and I truly love it. 
The comedy isn't as immature, but in many cases is directed towards adults. 
Election is truly a movie for teens and adults.  This factor may not seem too
impressive, but considering the films that have been coming out lately, such as
Ten Things I Hate About You or Jawbreaker, it would be considered a
masterpiece.
The Bottom Line- I elect this the best, funniest comedy in years.

Title
Review for I Still Know What You Did Last Summer (1998)
I STILL KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER by DeWyNGaLe    Rating: B
http://members.aol.com/DeWyNGaLe
In October of 1997, audiences were dazzled by the horror surprise hit I Know
What You Did Last Summer.  The film went on to gross over 70 million dollars in
the U.S., and even developed a cult following, much like the previous year's
100 million dollar grossing Scream.  When the trailer hit theaters in September
attached to Urban Legend, it looked like a wonderful follow-up.  Did it live up
to the first film?  The answer is no.
Jennifer Love Hewitt returns as Julie James, a survivor of the serial killer
that attempted to kill her and her friends a year before.  She has been so
upset since the incident.  Nightmares haunt her all over the place, but she has
to move on.  She know attends college, and is best friends with a funny,
outgoing girl named Karla (Brandy), who is trying to hook Julie up with Will
Benson, played by newcomer Matthew Settle.  Karla's boyfriend is Tyrell, the
funny, outgoing type, who is played by Soul Food's Mekhi Phifer.  Freddie
Prinze Jr. also returns as Ray, Julie's boyfriend from a year ago.  One
morning, Julie and Karla are called up by a local radio station who are
offering four tickets to the Bahamas if they can correctly identify the capital
of Brazil.  Of course, they answer it correctly, and they are off to the
Bahamas.  Julie wants Ray to come, but he declines the offer, so Karla secretly
invites Will instead to help boost her plan of hooking him up with Julie. 
After they arrive at their hotel, it is just them and the staff on the island. 
It starts off as the weekend of their dreams.  Something just had to come to
mess up the one care-free weekend of Julie's life though.  Ben Willis (Muse
Watson) is back, and he isn't letting anyone survive this time.  Will Ray come
to the rescue before he can kill them off one by one?
Jennifer Love Hewitt and Brandy turn in respectable performances.  Brandy in
particular was impressive, considering this is her first feature film.  You
could see that the characters were horrified, and they would do anything
possible to survive.  Matthew Settle and Freddie Prinze Jr. are a completely
different story.  Let's start with Settle.  Matthew is completely fake in this
film.  You could not believe a word coming out of his mouth.  You could tell he
was acting, and its reasons like him that this one isn't as good as the first
one.  He does do a good job towards the end, but that doesn't clear up the
scars he already left on the film.  Freddie Prinze Jr. is almost as bad as
Matthew Settle was.  He is almost completely unbelievable, and the majority of
his lines are completely meaningless and out of place.  We don't see him as
much as Settle, otherwise he could have done just as much damage as Settle did.
 Mekhi Phifer is alright as Tyrell, but yet again the dialogue is out of place.
The plot of I Still Know turns out to be a pretty good one at the end of the
movie.  I like where the filmmakers went with this second installment, but
maybe if it occurred in the same town as the first one, it would have been a
bit better.  The cinematography and setting of their island are simply
wonderful.  There are a lot of very nice shots around their hotel.  The sound
is pretty good, but still not as creepy as the first film's.  Jennifer Love
Hewitt's song, "How Do I Deal" is also played for about thirty seconds.
I Still Know What You Did Last Summer is nothing compared to the first film. 
The first film was very suspenseful, and it contained some very memorable
scenes.  The last fifteen minutes of I Still Know What You Did Last Summer
really picked up, and almost reached the same level as the first film.  Before
this part in the film, there are many unnecessary deaths and fake scares.  That
is okay though, because the film is still very much fun and there are a few
suspenseful scenes.  I think the reason this film wasn't as scary as the
original was because in the first one, the killer terrorized the people
involved in the incident.  He made them suffer for what they did.  In the
second film, Ben Willis just kills anyone he feels like.  He doesn't stick with
Ray and Julie, who were the ones he is actually after.  He had to go after
Karla, Will, and Tyrell.  If the characters he stalked were in some relation to
the incident that went on when he was ran over by Julie, Ray, Helen, and Barry,
it could have been much better, and it would have made a lot more sense.
The Bottom Line- Not a disappointment, but a third in the series would be out
of hand.   

Title
Review for Elizabeth (1998)
Elizabeth is the tale of Queen Elizabeth and her reign over England.  Cate
Blanchett plays the part of Elizabeth, who has a lot of problems in her life. 
Elizabeth has been accused of a crime and is threatened with the death penalty.
 The problem is that she is next in line to become the Queen of England.  When
her sister dies, she will become queen.  The only way she won't become queen is
if her sister decides to put her to death.  Her sister dies before she can make
the decision, and Elizabeth takes the thrown.
Elizabeth is extremely educational for children who don't know about the story
of Queen Elizabeth and her rule over England.  Elizabeth was like a history
text book, only a lot more interesting and fun to watch.  If it wasn't rated R,
many kids should see this moving and extremely educational story.  Elizabeth
ruled for over forty years, and people still talk about the great leader.  In
the film, we see why she is loved by so many people.  The way Elizabeth set
things up way back when is still the way things go in England.  
When Elizabeth comes to take power over England, she is a little overwhelmed. 
She is faced with making speeches, making important decisions, and pleasing all
of her people.  She is certainly a leader with a sense of humor.  She keeps the
people entertained, but she does her job at the same time.  Some people do not
like the decisions that Elizabeth is making.  A few attempts of murder have
been made towards Elizabeth.  This is a very hard time for Elizabeth.    
Everyone is forcing Elizabeth to marry.  She doesn't want to marry anyone, but
if she did marry someone it would by Lord Robert, played by Joseph Fiennes.  He
has been with Elizabeth for a long time, even before she became queen.  His
performance is very strong, and it only adds to the greatness of the film.  The
King of Spain is also trying to marry Elizabeth.  She decides she doesn't want
to be with anyone, and she will avoid men from now on.  She shaves her head
because she does not want to be attractive at all.  She doesn't want to be
married or to be with any man.    
The costumes in Elizabeth are outstanding.  Elizabeth's wardrobe is very
impressive ranging from extremely colorful dresses to very dull ones.  All of
them look very realistic.  The scenery is also realistic.  A lot of time and
effort was put towards the wonderful scenery pieces.  The castles in which many
people live are very nicely put together.  It looked like the movie was shot
back then, and it wasn't a recreation of the whole thing.  The film is very
dark and serious, and I liked that a lot.  There was little humor to it all,
which made it even more powerful.  Elizabeth shows how scary it was back in
those times.  Large numbers of people are tortured by Elizabeth's decisions.  
The best part of the entire film was Cate Blanchett's performance as Elizabeth.
 It was very surprising, considering that we don't see her in movies that
often.  Cate Blanchett's performance as the Queen Elizabeth was the best acting
performance of 1998.  Blanchett deserves an Oscar for the difficult role she
played.  She made you feel Elizabeth's pain about the tough positions she was
being put into.  The performance given by Blanchett was extremely moving and
powerful.  Her performance brought a lot into the movie, and if another actress
were to play her, I'm not sure if it would have worked.    
The Bottom Line- It was as golden as the story it told.

Title
Review for Doug's 1st Movie (1999)
DOUG'S 1ST MOVIE by DeWyNGaLe    Rating: C+
A few weeks ago, Doug's 1st Movie came out of nowhere with a poster and a
trailer.  There was no buzz building up to it or anything, which shows that
Disney through together a Doug movie without much notice at all, which could be
a sign that it isn't very good.  The trailers looked horrible.  Doug used to be
a great cartoon series in the time that it was aired on Nickelodeon from
1991-1996.  But in 1996, Disney took over the show and made some horrible
changes such as voices, looks, and setting of the show.  Personally, I think
the movie was a mistake in since the show had not gotten much attention ever
since it left Nickelodeon.  
The plot for Doug's 1st Movie goes like this: Doug is a normal kid in middle
school who has a huge crush on Patti, one of the most popular girls in school. 
He is always trying to impress Patti, and he will do anything to reach that
goal.  Doug's best friend is Skeeter.  Skeeter is a blue kid who also attends
the same school, but Skeeter is in love with Beebe, another blue person.  Doug
and Skeeter's latest adventure is trying to figure out the mystery of Lucky
Duck Lake.  Supposedly, a monster roams in the polluted waters of the lake. 
They actually find the monster, but the monster isn't a big and scary one who
eats people.  The monster is a sweet monster, who doesn't want to live in the
lake anymore because it is polluted hurts him.  From here on out, Doug must
take care of the monster to protect it from anyone who may harm it.
Meanwhile, a Valentine's Day dance for the kids at Doug's school is being
planned at "Funkytown."  Doug tried to get on the dance committee, but it turns
out that Guy Graham and Patti are on the team because Guy took Doug off the
list so he could be with Patti.  Doug is extremely jealous as Patti starts to
fall for Guy, and Patti calls Doug a liar about the whole monster incident. 
Doug isn't a very happy person right now.
The characters in the film are not developed at all, but for fans of the
television show, the characters will already be familiar.  The film should have
given some background on the characters for people new to the characters and
setting.
In Disney movies, hidden messages are often found that little kids will not
understand or catch, but many people do.  I caught many hidden messages in
Doug's 1st Movie which I thought were terrible and shouldn't in a Rated G
children's movie.  Hopefully, someone else will catch these same messages and
let Disney know that they have been caught.  The Little Mermaid, Aladdin, and
The Lion King also contained such messages.  The most obvious one was in
Aladdin when Aladdin states "Good teenagers take off their clothes," in a quiet
and muffled manner.         
The content of the film really isn't that bad, and it actually could have gone
somewhere, but it isn't presented in an interesting enough form.  The entire
monster plot line could have been erased from the film, leaving the sub-plot of
Doug trying to get Patti back from Guy as the main plot.  I didn't really
approve of the monster plot, considering Doug is almost always a very realistic
show.  The plot line containing the monster was very boring, very predictable,
and very unoriginal.  Even though the main sub-plot wasn't all that original
either, it was certainly a lot more fun to watch.
The Bottom Line- The title is Doug's 1st Movie.  Let's hope there isn't Doug's
2nd Movie.

Title
Review for That Thing You Do! (1996)
That Thing You Do! seems a lot like the story of the Beatles.  The truth is,
That Thing You Do! is a lot better than the Beatles movies, and some of the
music on the soundtrack is almost as good as Beatles music.  The only
explanation for this is that That Thing You Do! must be a lot like the story of
the Beatles, and this is true.  Jimmy Mattingly, played by Johnathon Schaech,
is a very serious musician.  He is in a group with no title at the time, which
consists of Lenny played by Steve Zahn, the "bass player", played by Ethan
Embry, and Chad, played by Giovanni Ribisi.  The four are teenagers growing up
in the sixties, heavily influenced by music.  Their band performs music similar
to the style that was popular back then, especially the Beatles.  Faye, played
by Liv Tyler is Jimmy's girlfriend, and she also helps out the band when she
can.  
After Chad is injured before a huge contest, the group is desperate to find a
replacement drummer.  They end up picking up Guy Patterson, the appliance store
working drummer, played by Tom Everett Scott.  Guy adds a lot to the group,
including the group's new name, The Wonders.  At the night of the contest, Guy
speeds up the drum beat a lot on the song they are performing, entitled "That
Thing You Do."  The song sounds much better faster, and the crowd responds very
positively to the song.  They win the contest, and now the Wonders are headed
for stardom.
After winning the contest, more and more gigs open up for the group.  Mr.
White, played by Tom Hanks, has taken interest in the group's music.  Mr. White
is associated with Playtone Records, one of the biggest record companies
around.  Therefore, the Wonders start to be heard all over the world.  They
produce a single that sells millions.  The Wonders have gone from being a group
who performs at the bar on the corner to rock and roll shows across the
country.
The acting in the film is great on almost every second of the film.  There are
times when the acting is a little off or unrealistic, but for the most part it
is great.  Liv Tyler and Tom Everett Scott's performances stuck out the most in
the large cast, even more than Hanks's. The acting is one of many things that
contributed to the greatness of the film.  The way it was filmed, plot,
characters, setting, and sound all added a whole lot.
Other than Tom Hanks, at the time of the film, the other stars were barely
known by people around the country.  Since That Thing You Do!, Johnathon
Schaech has starred in Hush and Welcome To Woop Woop, Tom Everett Scott has
starred in the Academy Award nominated One True Thing, Dead Man On Campus, and
American Werewolf In Paris, Liv Tyler has starred in Armageddon and Inventing
The Abbots, Steve Zahn has starred in Forces Of Nature and Out Of Sight, Ethan
Embry has starred in Can't Hardly Wait and Vegas Vacation, and Giovanni Ribisi
has starred in The Mod Squad and The Other Sister.  That Thing You Do!
certainly launched every one of these young people's careers.
The soundtrack in That Thing You Do! is amazing.  There are various different
slow, fast, and catchy songs that are fun to listen to included in the film. 
The right songs were played at the right times to get you in the mood for the
scenes about to take place.  The soundtrack in a film is a very important
thing, and the makers of That Thing You Do! surely succeeded in this area of
the film.
The Bottom Line- Congratulations Mr. Hanks.    

Title
Review for Edtv (1999)
EDTV is the third recent film with a similar plot line.  In June 1998, the
first one was released.  The Truman Show starred Jim Carrey as a man whose
entire life was a television show, and he didn't even know it.  All his friends
and family were just acting.  The second one came in October 1998, which was
called Pleasantville.  Two kids get stuck in a sixties sitcom and they inspire
the people in the show to live, and they become color once they discover who
they really are.  The third is EDTV, which is about a television show that
shows the life of someone twenty four hours a day.  Whoever is chosen by True
Tv, the company who is going to put the show on the air, will be a volunteer to
put their life on television.  The True Tv committee working on the show
consists of Cynthia, played by Ellen DeGeneres, who thought of the entire idea
of putting someone's life on the air.
The search will be a long one to find the right person to put on television. 
After a long search, Ed Pekurny, played by Matthew McConaughey, is chosen. 
They feel that he would be a fun person to watch twenty four hours a day.  Ed's
brother Ray, played by Woody Harrelson, likes the idea of the show, and wants
to advertise his new gym on television.  Ed's parents aren't very supportive of
the idea, and Al, who is Ed's mother's second husband, is extremely uneasy
about the idea.  Ed doesn't mind the cameras following him all day though. 
After Ray and his girlfriend Shari, played by Jenna Elfman, break up, Ed starts
going out with her.  Shari is on television constantly now also, and she
completely hates it.  She has no privacy, and she cannot go on.  She tries to
avoid the cameras as much as possible, but with Ed following her, it is
impossible.  I really liked the way the relationship between Ed and Shari was
developed.  Both the characters are developed very well, and we are given
background on both characters.  Therefore, they are both extremely fun and
likable characters.
At first EDTV was barely watched by anyone.  Everyone thought it was a low
point in America, but after people started watching it more and more, it grew
on to them.  EDTV has become a phenomenon.  Ed is about the only one that is
enjoying being filmed though.  The people involved in his life are very upset
and outraged about the things that are being put on to television.  
The performances in EDTV are wonderful.  Matthew McConaughey and Jenna Elfman
especially were wonderful in the large, star crowded cast.  It was nice to see
Ellen DeGeneres again after her show was canceled.  In the film, she delivers a
lot of laughs.  I feel that she was cast perfectly as Cynthia.  Although she
wasn't developed, she added a lot to the film.  Others who added to the film
were Elizabeth Hurley, who played Jill, a model who starts to take the place of
Shari as Ed's love interest, Dennis Hopper as Hank, Ed's biological father, and
Rob Reiner as Dr. Whitaker.  
At first, I thought that EDTV would be a complete rip-off of The Truman Show. 
It turns out I was wrong, considering EDTV was better than it.  Unlike The
Truman Show, EDTV is very funny, and isn't very dramatic.  I like the comedic
path better than the dramatic path that The Truman Show took.  Although the
second half in EDTV is based more on human emotions and the effects on Ed's
life, it still has the fun feel to it. EDTV was a lot of fun to watch.  It had
a soundtrack that was fun music, and it added to the feel of the film.  There
are a lot of fun and also touching moments in EDTV, some that I will think
about for awhile.  Towards the end of the film, it started to drag the
slightest bit.  Luckily, they ended it with an ending which was satisfying,
before it dragged on any more.  All of the elements were there to make this
film great, especially the large cast.  Expect large numbers at the box office
for this one.
The Bottom Line- A large cast of familiar, funny faces, makes EDTV great fun. 

Title
Review for Can't Hardly Wait (1998)
CAN'T HARDLY WAIT by DeWyNGaLe    Rating: A-
Can't Hardly Wait should have been the Scream of comedies.  It stars the
upcoming Ethan Embry (That Thing You Do!) as Preston Myers and superstar
Jennifer Love Hewitt (I Know What You Did Last Summer) as Amanda Beckett.  It
takes place at a graduation party the last night of school.  The big gossip
around the kids is that Amanda Beckett has been dumped by the most popular kid
in school, Mike Dexter. (Peter Fancinelli) Mike Dexter is just like a lot of
characters in comedies who thinks about college girls and how they are going to
be.  Their four year relationship is over, and now Preston sees an opportunity
to finally be with the one he has loved for so long.
We also meet Kenny Fischer played by Seth Green. (Enemy Of The State)  He is a
kid who thinks he is very cool and hip and he also thinks that everyone loves
him.  No one really likes him and he is extremely annoying.  Preston is also
great friends with Denise Fleming played by Lauren Ambrose.  She has a bad
attitude and not many people know her.  Awhile back, she was best friends with
Kenny.  There is also William Lichter, played by Charlie Korsmo.  After we meet
everyone, the party begins.  The music is playing, people are dancing, and
everyone is getting drunk.
Amanda's friends try to help her with what she is going through, although she
isn't really saddened by Mike's actions.  Preston continues to see Amanda
throughout the night, and tries very hard to talk with her, but just can't do
it.  He has a long letter that he has written, but when he sees her with
another guy, he throws it away.  The letter still gets to Amanda though, in
many weird ways.  She reads the letter and is touched and immediately wants to
find this Preston Myers kid.  When he finds her and finally has the guts to
tell her he loves her, she tells him off, not knowing who it is.
Throughout the night, many other events also take place.  William and company
want to get revenge on the jocks for all they have done to them, Kenny wants to
hook up with someone and the party, and a band named "Loveburger" fights a lot
whether what to wear during their performance.  All of the sub-plots together,
including Mike and Amanda's sun-plot all made the film a better one.
The plot of Can't Hardly wait is extremely simple, but it works very well. 
Most of the characters in the movie are much like kids today, having problems
with the world around them.  Many people will be able to relate to this movie. 
I do not see why this film is not more popular.  Everything is there for it to
be a hit movie, including Seth Green and Jennifer Love Hewitt, a great
soundtrack, a lot of funny moments, and a PG-13 rating.
The performances in the film are very realistic.  They played the characters so
it was very easy to understand that character's personality, and the way they
felt about other people.  Seth Green and Lauren Ambrose perhaps gave the best
performances as their funny, original characters.  Jennifer Love Hewitt was
good as always, but didn't get the screen time she deserved.  For Ethan Embry,
I think Can't Hardly Wait will be a break through movie.  He did a really
surprising job, and his character was certainly a step up from That Thing You
Do!'s bass player.  The supporting performances from Peter Facinelli, Charlie
Korsmo, and even Jenna Elfman added to the feel of the movie.
The Bottom Line- I can't hardly wait to see this one again and again.

Title
Review for She's All That (1999)
SHE'S ALL THAT by DeWyNGaLe    Rating: B-
She's All That has a story that is very common.  It has a new teenager twist
though, which will make the story line available to a larger audience.  I have
been very much anticipating this new film.  The up and coming Freddie Prinze
Jr. stars as Zack, the most popular kid at his high school.  Zack is in trouble
now.  His girlfriend Taylor, played by Jodi Lyn O'Keefe, went on MTV's Spring
Break over their school's spring break.  She met a guy from the show "The Real
World", Brock Hudson. (Matthew Lillard) She decides to break up with Zack. 
Zack is extremely angered with Taylor's decision.  Zack talks with his best
friend Dean, played by Paul Walker, (Varsity Blues) about what Taylor did.  The
two make a bet that Zack can turn any girl in the school into the prom queen in
six weeks.  Dean picks Laney Boggs, (Rachael Leigh Cook) the school dork.  The
film's first twenty minutes are quite promising.  Music accompanies the opening
almost the entire time.  She's All That was on its way to being great until
Zack made the bet.
Zack meets up with Laney and gets rejected by her.  His project is even tougher
now that she ignores him.  He follows her around, and tries to get involved in
her life.  The two of them become extremely close friends.  Laney is now
popular.  At school, Laney has even been nominated for prom queen.  Zack has
helped out Laney a lot.  The problem is that he is doing all this for the wrong
reasons.  
Freddie Prinze Jr. has reassured me that he can act after his terrible
performance in I Still Know What You Did Last Summer.  The character of Zack
was developed pretty well.  The film explained the fact very well that he is
extremely popular.  Everyone looks up to Zack, even kids in middle school. 
Taylor's characters is very annoying at many times in the movie.  She is just
the kind of character that you wish wasn't even in the movie.  The performance
by Jodi Lyn O'Keefe was well done, but the character really annoyed me.  Paul
Walker's character, Dean was also annoying.  Is these two characters were
changed a bit, this could have helped the film out a lot.   
A large cast is pretty much what saved She's All That from being terrible. 
Clea DuVall, Usher Raymond, and Sarah Michelle Gellar make extremely brief
performances.  If these characters were brought into the film more, they could
have helped the total outcome.  The main characters are developed pretty well
in the film, but we could have known a little more about Zack and Taylor's
background.
She's All That, like many teen comedies these days, makes you feel good about
yourself.  The music and characters are upbeat and nineties, and that's what I
liked the best about the film.  The dance sequence at the prom was very nicely
done.  The choreography was very nicely done.
Little suspense was put into the film at all.  It was extremely predictable
what was going to happen.  If a few more twists and turns were added to the
over-used plot, She's All That could have been a lot better.  Many sub plots
went on throughout the movie.  I think the sub plot of the prom queen race
could have been added to for some more fun in the film.  The film is also slow
moving at times.  My mind drifted away three or four times throughout the film.
The Bottom Line- It could have been "all that", but not enough effort was put
into it. 

Title
Review for Star Wars (1977)
STAR WARS EPISODE IV: A NEW HOPE by DeWyNGaLe    Rating: A+
http://members.aol.com/DeWyNGaLe
In 1977, something never though possible happened.  The film Star Wars was
released, with extraordinary, never seen before techniques of special effects. 
The film set a new standard for special effects in film.  Not only did it set a
standard for the special effects, it set a standard for film itself.  The plot
is one of the most creative I heard ever.  The legend of Star Wars starts long
ago with the Jedi.  The Jedi were warriors who were wiped out by the dark side.
 Darth Vader is the leader of the dark side.  Ben Obi-Wan Kenobi, played by Sir
Alec Guinness, was one of those Jedi who is still alive today.  Darth Vader was
once a Jedi, until he turned to the dark side.  Years after the killing of the
Jedi, Darth Vader is still around causing trouble.  
R2-D2 and C-3P0 are both what we call "driods", or robots that are of
assistance to humans.  While an attack on the ship that Princess Leia, played
by Carrie Fisher, is aboard, she inserts a message to R2-D2, who is also on the
ship. to Obi-Wan Kenobi pleading for help.  The Princess is captured by Vader,
but R2-D2 and C-3P0 get away on an escape pod that eventually lands them on the
remote planet of Tatooine.  The Jawas, or small creatures who sell droids, pick
R2-D2 and C-3P0 up to sell.  They are bought by Luke Skywalker's (Mark Hamill)
family.  While Luke is cleaning the droids, the message from Princess Leia is
found.  Luke finds this Obi-Wan Kenobi, and learns that Obi-Wan was a friend of
Luke's father, who is now dead.  Luke also learns his family was a Jedi.
After Luke's family is killed by tropps from the dark side, Ben decides to put
Luke through training to stop the dark side and destroy them once and for all. 
Ben wants to create a new Jedi.  First, the two must find Princess Leia and
serve her.  Han Solo, played by Harrison Ford, and his sidekick Chewbacca,
played by Peter Mayhew, are consulted about providing a ship to complete the
tasks necessary.  After meeting up with Leia, the film really picks up.  Luke
continues his training as a pilot and to become a Jedi, Ben Kenobi confronts
Darth Vader, and many other interesting events occur. 
Star Wars is an amazing epic.  The plot is so original and amazing, I cannot
believe it.  The special effects, especially for its time, are wonderful and
realistic.  The space scenes in particular are the most fun to watch.  The
ships flown by all are very unique and creative.  The costumes are also out of
this world.  The scenery is so different from anything I have ever seen before.
 There are a variety of different very memorable set pieces that will stay with
me forever.    
The entire premise of Star Wars is amazing.  The creatures and droids that we
see throughout the film are one of a kind.  Even the human characters are
different.  Every character is extremely likable and different from characters
from other sci fi films.  The acting on everyone's part is great, especially
that of Sir Alec Guinness's.  
Even though the concept is not realistic at all, it is pulled off very nicely. 
The acting, setting, effects, costumes, and sound make it work.  If any of
these were messed up, Star Wars would have come off as one huge joke.  The
ending works very well, and left it very open to the sequels that came
afterward.  In early 1997, a special edition of Star Wars was released.  The
film was re-mastered so it looked better than it did in 1977.  A few creatures
were added here and there, and even an entire deleted scene with Han Solo and
Jabba The Hutt (seen in Return Of The Jedi) was added to the film.  Think
that's enough?  On May 19, 1999, Star Wars Episode I: The Phantom Menace will
be released, followed by two more films that will reveal what went on before A
New Hope.  With this, Star Wars is bound to become the greatest tale told in
our time.

Title
Review for Ravenous (1999)
The topic of cannibalism is a very serious one, and you hardly see the topic
taken as seriously as it was in Ravenous as you usually do.  The plot of
Ravenous is actually quite original, and although disgusting, it was a good
one.  During the Mexican-American war in the small town of Ravenous,
California, John Boyd, played by Guy Pearce, Cleaves, played by David Arquette,
Toffler, played by Saving Private Ryan's Jeremy Davies, and Hart, played by
Jeffrey Jones, and Martha, played by Sheila Tousey are among the characters
that we're acquainted with.  When a man who has been in the cold for some time
now, the people take him inside to keep him warm and safe.  The man is
Colqhoun, played by Robert Carlyle, a man who has a long, eerie story regarding
how he came to be at Ravenous, California.  After Colqhoun shows up, so does
the idea of cannibalism.  You can pretty much see where the film goes from
here, but I do not want to reveal too much.  The film is quite unpredictable,
and I enjoyed that.
The leading performances by Carlyle and Pearce are simply amazing.  Carlyle in
particular played a great villain, and he was also a very believable and
realistic villain.  Carlyle plays the part to near perfection, if not
perfection.  He is most likely the best villain I have seen since the Joker,
played by Jack Nicholson, in Batman.  Carlyle will also play a villain in the
upcoming Bond film, The World Is Not Enough, that will be in theaters this
November.  Pearce was great as John Boyd.  I don't want to reveal too much
about either one of the character's because there isn't much to tell, and if I
do, the entire plot will be given away.
Unfortunately, we don't get to know any of the supporting roles very well.  The
supporting characters generally have around seven to eight minutes of screen
time, which was very disappointing to me.  The stunning performance by Carlyle
made up for the absence of the supporting characters though.  Jeremy Davies is
quite honorable in the few moments he is the film.  He plays the most effective
supporting role.  We didn't know much about him at all, but we saw him the
most.  Arquette delivers a few laughs and sort of brightens up the film in a
few dark places.  Arquette's character doesn't go anywhere either.  
Ravenous was a great movie, and it was very well put together, but I do not
approve of the film at all.  It is one of the most gruesome movies I have ever
seen and it should not be viewed.  It may sound like I am over exaggerating,
but this movie could without a doubt influence potential psychotic people to
try and eat other people.  If the film was bad and the theme of cannibalism
wasn't taken as seriously, then it really wouldn't have mattered, but the topic
is not presented lightly at all.  Do not expect a lot of fun or funny moments
in Ravenous.  It is extremely dark and unfavorable, but it was pulled off very
well.  
The film does not tone down on the blood and gore at all.  We are shown a lot
of flesh being eaten, people being brutally murdered for their flesh, and the
site of blood shows up everywhere and all the time.  Very disturbing images
that are almost unforgettable are still fresh in my mind.  I couldn't even look
at the screen for parts of the movie.  This is your warning.  If you cannot
stand the site of blood, you will not be able to watch this movie without
getting an upset stomach. 
The Bottom Line- Without a doubt, one of the best snack movies ever.  (Yeah
right!)

Title
Review for Jawbreaker (1999)
Jawbreaker is the tale of what can happen when innocent birthday pranks can go
wrong.  At Reagan High, four girls are sitting on top of the world.  Courtney,
played by Rose McGowan, is the meanest girl in the school.  Everyone hates her,
but everyone wishes they had her popularity.  She is the leader of the four
girls.  Julie, played by Rebecca Gayheart, Liz Purr, played by Charlotte
Roldan, and Marcie, played by Julie Benz are the other three in the group.  It
is Liz's seventeenth birthday, and Julie, Courtney, and Marcie decide to play a
prank on her.  They wake her up in scary outfits, shove a jawbreaker in her
mouth and put tape over it to make her be quiet, and shove her in the trunk of
their car.  After awhile, they check up on her and she is dead, the jawbreaker
caught in her throat.  The girls cannot believe what has happened.  Courtney
wants to cover it up, and just act like she is sick, but Julie knows the right
thing to do.  The first ten minutes where these events occur were very
interesting, and showed a lot of potential towards a great movie, but it
started to fade off.
The girls decide to put Liz back in bed, and make it look like some man killed
her.  Julie is totally against them.  Now, the girls have run into a problem. 
Fern, the most unpopular girl in the school witnessed the event of them trying
to cover it up.  Courtney makes a deal.  She will turn Fern into one of the
popular girls if she will keep her mouth shut.  Everything is different now at
Reagan High.  Julie has dropped out of the popular group, and she really wants
to tell the police what happened.  Besides, she didn't do much anyway.  From
here, Rebecca Gayheart is not seen very much in the film, and that is a big
disappointment.  Her acting skills were the best among the large cast, and she
could have added to the film.  When Rebecca's character does show up, the film
starts to pick up and get more interesting.
Fern's new alias is Vylette, and everyone admires her.  She is even more
popular than Courtney and she doesn't think this is right.  Vylette is
extremely annoying and Judy Greer delivers a terrible, annoying, overdone
acting performance.  If it wasn't for the character of Vylette, the film could
have been a lot better.  Julie tries to turn Vylette back to the good side, but
is unsuccessful, because now Vylette doesn't want to do the right thing and
tell the truth to the police.  Julie Benz also gave a horrid performance, and
was almost as annoying as the character of Vylette.  Rose McGowan was good, but
not as good as she was as "Tatum", in 1996's Scream. Her role was annoying, but
in a good way.  She was extremely mean, and she was the type of character that
was neat, but you downright hated her.
Throughout the film, it gets way off track and drifts a lot.  We get way off of
the topic of the jawbreaker incident, and get into things that don't have
anything to do with the actual film.  The beginning and ending are great, it's
just the middle that needed a lot of help.  During the body of the movie, it
seemed to be the same thing for about an hour.  Nothing interesting happened,
and the same, extremely annoying song plays over and over again.  Don't get me
wrong, Jawbreaker wasn't a bad film, but it certainly wasn't very good.  It
isn't very funny either.  It tries to use the type of humor used in Clueless,
but it doesn't succeed at all.  There are only a few amusing sequences, but
they die off quickly.  A nice performance that was in the film was Officer Vera
Cruz, played by the popular Pam Grier.  She was the detective trying to crack
the case of the jawbreaker.  
The Bottom Line- Benz and Greer should have taken a lesson from the pros-
McGowan and Gayheart.   

Title
Review for Empire Strikes Back, The (1980)
STAR WARS EPISODE V: EMPIRE STRIKES BACK by John Sylva (DewyNGale@aol.com)   
Rating: A
http://members.aol.com/DeWyNGaLe
Luke Skywalker (Mark Hamill), Princess Leia (Carrie Fisher), Han Solo (Harrison
Ford), C-3P0 (Anthony Daniels), R2-D2 (Kenny Baker), and Chewbacca (Peter
Mayhew) all return for the sequel to the best movie of all time (as of yet
anyway).  Everyone says sequels are bad, huh?  Not when it's a Star Wars movie!
 Empire Strikes Back is one of the best sequels of all time, almost meeting the
standards the first film set.  In Empire Strikes Back, we are informed that
Darth Vader (Voiced by James Earl Jones, David Prowse in costume) is obsessed
with finding Luke Skywalker.  Currently, Luke is with Leia, Solo, Chewbacca,
C-3P0, and R2-D2 at the ice planet of Hoth, in which they are fighting a battle
against the empire which wants to capture the young Skywalker.  Vader believes
that Luke can be a great help to the dark side, because he is very powerful,
and the "force" is with him.
Luke is summoned during the snow battle by Ben Kenobi (Alec Guinness) that he
is to find a Jedi warrior named "Yoda" in the "Dagobah System."  Of course,
this means nothing to Luke, so he must bring R2-D2 along with him on his
journey to Dagobah.  Once arriving there, he learns that Jedi training is very
difficult.  Yoda, voiced by Frank Oz, is a very wise, old creature that will
guide Luke through his path to become a great Jedi warrior.  Yoda and Ben
Kenobi both believe that Luke must be trained to become a Jedi and to fight for
the good side, before Darth Vader and the evil Emperor try to summon him to the
dark side.
Meanwhile, Han Solo, Princess Leia, C-3P0, and Chewbacca must stop at a city in
the clouds, called Cloud City, where an old friend of Han's lives.  Lando
Calrissian (Billy Dee Williams), Han's friend, becomes a main character as he
tags along for all of the crazy adventures.  From here, Darth Vader starts
getting involved with Luke and the others.  We get into the same sort of theme
as we did in A New Hope, only not quite as good.
The special effects in Empire Strikes Back are up there with the stunning
effects of A New Hope.  We get to see some new creatures and ships this time
around, which were very interesting and original.  The space scenes in Empire
Strikes back were done much more nicely than in the original, giving more of a
variety of set pieces.
Empire Strikes Back seemed much more mature than A New Hope in many ways.  This
is both good and bad.  On the good side, the acting performances, especially
from Carrie Fisher and Mark Hamill, are so much better and more realistic than
their performances in the first film.  Harrison Ford was just as brilliant as
he was in the last one.  Billy Dee Williams, who is appearing in his first Star
Wars movie, made an impact on the film.  In my opinion, he was a wonderful
edition to the saga.  On the bad side, Empire Strikes Back wasn't as much fun
as A New Hope.  It was a lot more serious, and didn't seem to have the same
charm that A New Hope had to it. 
Another way that the Star Wars series matured in Empire Strikes Back is the use
of set design.  Many of the settings in A New Hope seemed a little incomplete,
but in Empire Strikes Back, we are taken through wonderful, realistic worlds
with great settings.  Cloud City and Dagobah in particular stood out visually
from other set pieces.
The Star Wars Special Edition version of Empire Strikes Back includes a much
better film technically, with beefed up special effects, sound, and some new
images here and there.  The special effects seemed a lot more realistic in this
version, and so did certain creatures that roamed among the worlds in Empire
Strikes Back.  The Special Edition is certainly the way to go.
The Bottom Line- Sequels are terrible?  I don't see how you can say that with
this original, terrific sequel.

Title
Review for Faculty, The (1998)
Kevin Williamson is now without a doubt one of the most acclaimed writers in
America today.  He has worked hard to get where he is, and with The Faculty, he
proves that he is a grade-a writer.  In his latest movie, The Faculty, he teams
up with Robert Rodriguez director of From Dusk Till Dawn and Desperado.  How
could it lose??  It didn't at all.  In The Faculty, the plot is that aliens are
taking over the teachers at Harrington High.  The high school is located in a
pretty crummy part of Ohio, where it isn't very nice at all.  One attraction
that the city loves is the football games every Friday night.  Almost the
entire town is there.  As we see more into the high school, we learn about the
students.  There is a large variety of different types of people, unlike many
other movies.
We are introduced to Casey, played by the upcoming Elijah Wood.  Casey is the
kind of kid who gets beat up every day, and he is the school geek.  Supposedly,
every school has a kid like him, and Casey is that kid in Harrington High.  We
see alot of Casey throughout the movie, and his personality kind of grows on to
you.  We also meet Zeke.  Supposedly, there is also one of Zeke in every
school.  Zeke is played by the also upcoming Josh Hartnett.  Zeke is the class
clown.  He sells drugs and other related items to the students at Harrington
High.  Stan is played by Shawn Hatosy.  He gets terrible grades and is the
captain of the football team.  He is dating Deliah played by Jordana Brewster. 
She is the school gossiper, and she writes for the school paper.  Stokely is a
very different person.  She is played by Clea DuVall and is extremely mean to
everyone else.  She has no friends, wears all black, and there is a dirty
rumour about her around school that she is a lesbian.  Marybeth (Laura Harris)
is the new girl in school.  She came from Georgia and doesn't have many friends
considering she is brand new to the school.  She tries making friends with
Stokely, but Stokely just tells her off.
Now, meet the faculty.  There is Mr. Furlong, (Jon Stewart) the science
teacher,  Principal Drake (Bebe Neuwirth), Nurse Harper (Salma Hayek), Coach
Wills (Robert Patrick), Miss Burke, (Famke Janssen) the English teacher, Mr.
Tate (Daniel Von Bargen), and Miss Olsen (Piper Laurie).  One by one, the
faculty is turned to aliens who want the students and the entire city turned
into the same species.  The faculty needs water as much as possible for some
reason.  They drink and drink and drink.  A teacher runs to a shower but dries
out because did not have enough water.  At this point, the students are getting
a little bit suspicious as the teacher's personalities completely change.
The first time they know for sure something is going on is when Deliah and
Casey sneak into the faculty lounge.  They hide in the closet when some of the
staff members enter.  They find a body of a teacher in the closet and they see
some weird events occur among the teachers as they watch through the cracks. 
They run and now the teachers now that the students know.  When Casey and
Deliah try to inform others, people just think they are crazy.  At night, Casey
even sees three faculty members outside of his house waiting, considering he
knows.
Another incident occurs when the six students meet in the same room and an odd
encounter with Mr. Furlong happens.  Now, these six students will have to kill
the master of this alien race before it is too late.  Stokely is a sci-fi freak
and gives many tips about what to do and what is going to happen.  The students
conclude that they can be dried out by Zeke's drugs.  All six must take some of
the drugs to prove they aren't one of them.  As you guessed it, one or maybe
even two or three of the kids are aliens.  They do escape though and aren't
seen until later on.
The remaining kids are determined to find the leader of the aliens.  They go to
the football game suspecting that the leader is Coach Willis.  The football
team is obviously turned because they are continuously attacking the opposing
team.  It's a good thing that Stan quit the team before this encounter.  Or was
it too late?  When the students find the master, this is where the special
effects kick in.  We see a huge, gross alien that wants to turn every human
being into one of them.  A very suprising conclusion takes place, and that is
great especially in horror movies.
As The Faculty started, it seemed like the same old stuff.  The first fifteen
minutes were pretty slow and that's why it didn't get the perfect four.  The
plot wasn't the best in the world either, but the way the actors brought the
screenplay to life, it was very nicely done.  The cast is what brought The
Faculty to a great level.  Piper Laurie, Clea DuVall, and Elijah Wood brought
the most into this sci-fi/horror flick.  For all of you who thought Usher
Raymond, popular rap singer, was in the movie, think again.  He appeared for
about five minutes as a role that we didn't get to know.  With such a large
ensemble cast, you would think that the character development wouldn't be all
that great.  Think again, you could pretty much write a book about each
character.  Hands down to Kevin Williamson and Robert Rodriguez for bringing us
the best horror flick of the year.  It may not have been extremely scary, but
it was certainly very nicely put together and will go down as a classic.

Title
Review for Simply Irresistible (1999)
SIMPLY IRRESISTIBLE by DeWyNGaLe    Rating: B-
Amanda is a young, innocent girl who works at her mother's restaurant.  They
have been in business for seventy-five years, but now bigger businesses are
opening, taking away customers.  Amanda feels responsible for the lack of
customers, considering she's the cook.  At the market, she encounters a strange
man who sells her some crabs.  When she gets back to the restaurant, she can
magically cook!  In the market, she also met another man named Tom, played by
Sean Patrick Flanery.  She learns that he is opening up a fancy, expensive
restaurant.  He learns about her restaurant as well.  Now, Amanda is seeing Tom
a lot.  All of these good things started happening to her when she got those
crabs.  She doesn't think much of it, except she is very happy! Tom's
restaurant seems like something out of a fairy tale.  It is in a store that
seems like it is from a fairy tale as well.  Throughout the film, they continue
to build it.  Tom is very nervous about the opening of it. 
Gellar does a nice job as the role of Amanda, but the character had no depth. 
We didn't know any background on the character at all, except she couldn't cook
very well before she got a crab.  Gellar was mis-cast as this role.  In my
opinion, she wasted a lot of time on effort on this film.  Her talent is above
this level of movie.  Flanery's character of Tom is extremely annoying.  We
don't know anything about him, except that he is rich.  Flanery gives a
terrible performance.  It didn't seem like he was putting any effort into the
role of Tom.
Amanda continues to cook wonderful meals, which is drawing crowds of people
from all over to her restaurant.  She couldn't be happier.  Now, strange things
are going on with her and her cooking.  In one scene, she and Tom float because
they ate one of her dishes.  Fog fills the room.  These effects are extremely
corny and cheap.  She discovers at a dinner party that what she is feeling is
going into her food.  If she is upset, the people who eat it are upset.  It was
a pretty good concept, it just could have been portrayed a little bit better
and a little more realistically.  The film should have deleted the entire magic
plot line and made it about Tom and Amanda, or they should have had the plot
about Amanda and saving her restaurant.  They don't both work together very
well at all.  It plays like a Bewitched episode, only 95 minutes long.  The
music throughout the film is very corny as well.  These are the key problems in
Simply Irresistible.    
Nothing is ever explained in Simply Irresistible, and that gets extremely
annoying.  It certainly wasn't extraordinary, but it was certainly enjoyable. 
The ending and beginning were extremely stupid, but the middle seemed to be
pretty good.  Simply Irresistible did do what it was supposed to do.  The goal
of romantic comedies is to keep you in suspense about whether the two main
characters are going to be together or not.  Unlike She's All That, I found
myself wanting the two to get together.  Sarah Michelle Gellar saved this film
from being horrible.  Some of the parts in the film are extremely humorous, but
some of them have been used way too many times and aren't funny anymore. 
The Bottom Line- Simply Irresistible wasn't exactly irresistible, but not
resistible either.    

Title
Review for Stepmom (1998)
As I saw in the trailers that Julia Roberts, Susan Sarandon, and Ed Harris were
starring in this drama I thought...how could it not be good?  Well, my question
stayed true, considering Stepmom is the best movie of the year.  It is shown as
more of a comedy, but it is mostly a tear jerking drama.  Everyone was in tears
in the theater I was in.  When I sat back in my seat and waited for the movie
to start, little did I know I was about to see the most amazing film since
Titanic.
Susan Sarandon plays Jackie, mother of Ben and Anna.  She was married to Luke
(Ed Harris), but they were divorced three years back when Luke walked out. 
Luke is now seeing Isabel, a young, funny, nice young girl played by Julia
Roberts.  Jackie and the kids despise Isabel though.  Mostly because she is
tearing the family apart by seeing Luke.  Isabel is extremely nice to the kids,
but they don't care.  For instance when Isabel buys them a puppy Anna says
"Well I'm allergic to dogs and I'm allergic to you, too."  
Jackie and Luke have something tremendous to tell one another.  One is more
serious then the other, but Luke goes first.  He lets Jackie know that he and
Isabel are getting married.  At this point, Jackie doesn't say what she wanted
to say and simply states it wasn't important.  But, this thing is extremely
important.  Something that is tremendous.  (I won't tell you what it is
though.)  Jackie continues to lie about her secret to the family.  At this
point, Jackie is sick of all the fuss and wants the family to be happy.  She
gives the kids tips to getting along with Isabel, and they work, a little too
well.  Now the kids think of Isabel as their mother, and Jackie thinks she is
out of the picture.  She becomes very jealous at this point.
Stepmom depicts the average 90s family, with tenseness, sadness, happiness, and
angryness.  This movie is a story about life and the roads that it can take you
on.  It lets you know that you should enjoy what you have because you never
know when it will all come to an end.  Susan Sarandon gives the best
performance of the year and she definitely deserves and Oscar Nomination. 
Roberts and Harris also give outstanding performances.  I don't know about you,
but Stepmom was so special to me, I can't explain it.  Hands down to one of the
greatest movies of the year.

Title
Review for Bride of Chucky (1998)
BRIDE OF CHUCKY by DeWyNGaLe    Rating: C
Child's Play is one of the most popular horror series around today.  In 1988,
the first film, Child's Play, was released and became a cult hit instantly. 
Two more films were released afterwards, and now, the fourth installment in the
Child's Play series has arrived.  In this one, Tiffany, played by the Oscar
nominated actress Jennifer Tilly, plays the girlfriend of Chucky when Chucky
was still a human.  When Chucky became a doll, their relationship was ruined. 
Years later, Tiffany has found Chucky, who has been almost completely destroyed
after the events that took place in Child's Play 3.  
Tiffany's plan is to bring Chucky back to life so the two can be together once
again.  She does so, but he isn't as nice as she had hoped.  After locking him
up in a cage, she decides to buy him a doll of a bride so he can have some
company.  Chucky is infuriated with Tiffany.  He breaks lose of the cage and
kills Tiffany while she is taking a bath.  Now, using voodoo, he transfers her
into the body of the doll.  She is the bride of Chucky.
The scenes with Tiffany and Chucky are especially funny.  The first thirty
minutes of the film, which includes these hilarious scenes, are the best parts
of the movie.  From here on, the film goes downhill.  When Tiffany was a human,
she lived in a trailer park.  Her neighbor was Jesse, played by Nick Stabile, a
teenager who helped her out with some things.  Tiffany and Chucky need to get
to New Jersey to find the amulet in the human form of Chucky's grave so that
they can be transferred into human bodies once again.  On the phone, Tiffany
calls Jesse and asks him to drive two dolls to New Jersey.  Thinking that the
Tiffany on the phone is the real Tiffany, Jesse accepts the offer.  He brings
his girlfriend Jade, played by Katherine Heigl.  The two plan to get married on
their journey to New Jersey, because of her over protective uncle that she
lives with, who is a police sheriff, played by John Ritter.  He does not want
them seeing each other, so she decides to run away.  From here, Chucky and
Tiffany go on a killing spree on their way to New Jersey which lead to some
funny and corny moments.  
The plot of Bride of Chucky is a little strange.  It is a lot of fun though. 
The film is not much of a horror movie, as the other ones were, but more of a
dark comedy.  Like I said, the film works wonderfully for the first thirty
minutes, but with one-dimensional characters such as Jade and Jesse that throw
the movie into the same old horror movie stuff, the film cannot succeed
overall.  The Tiffany doll was nice to have for a change, rather than Chucky by
himself.  She added a lot to the film.  Chucky is the same as ever.  He has a
bad temper and is also very funny.  The two together are very funny.  
After a while on the trip to New Jersey, the film becomes pretty much
pointless.  It is very repetitive throughout parts of the film.  A lot of jokes
do work, especially Tiffany's obsession with Martha Stuart.  The reason I did
like this film so much was mainly because it was so different from everything
else.  Although it wasn't horror, it was a fun plot and a fun movie.  If the
film concentrated completely on the dolls and not other characters such as
Jesse and Jade, the film could have been much better.  The way I look at it is-
A movie about a girl who is transformed into a doll hooks up with Chucky and
they go on a killing spree.  How good could it be?
The Bottom Line- More sequels could be made in this series- As long as they are
as different as this one.

Title
Review for Mummy, The (1999)
http://members.aol.com/DeWyNGaLe
The summer movie season is always the biggest and brightest season for movies
throughout the year.  We are introduced to blockbuster hits that are usually
trashed by critics, loved by the people, and make tons of money at the box
office.  This year, the tradition continues with an update on the Universal
1932 classic, The Mummy.  I have always been a sucker for this kind of monster
movies, and I always seem to be the only critic who really likes them.  That
tradition continues as well with this fun special effects extravaganza.
In The Mummy, the up and coming Brendan Fraser stars as the adventurous
explorer Rick O'Connell.  He teams up with a curious, clumsy librarian named
Evelyn, played by Rachel Weisz, to find the mysterious city of the dead,
Hamunaptra.  Evelyn loves Egypt, and would truly like to visit the city that
people call a fable.  Rick has claimed he has been to Hamunaptra during a
battle, and that's why she chose him to lead her there.  Also tagging along on
the journey to the city of the dead is Evelyn's brother, Jonathan, played by
John Hannah (Sliding Doors).
Now in Hamunaptra, the three uncover "The Book of the Dead."  The curious
Evelyn unlocks the book, reads from it, and now the body of the ancient
Egyptian Imhotep (Arnold Vosloo) becomes alive and is out to kill the ones who
opened and read from the book.  Along with Imhotep arising from the dead, the
Ten Curses of Egypt become in full effect, launching unbelievable forces
against the three and another group who set out to find Hamunaptra.  Not only
is Imhotep furious with those who awoke him, he is also out to restore the life
of his girlfriend that lost her life long ago in ancient Egypt.
Don't expect huge things out of The Mummy, but just expect to have a good time.
 This movie is extremely campy and plays out like an old horror film with
beefed up special effects, which may turn off some viewers.  On the other hand,
this type of film is one of my favorites, but that's up to you to decide.
There is one thing that definitely not campy or corny about The Mummy though. 
The state of the art special effects take you into a completely different
world.  We are dazzled by faces rising out of the desert, swarms of beetles and
locusts, and even creatures crawling under a human's skin.  These may have been
in other movies before, but not like in The Mummy.  As of now, The Mummy holds
the title for best special effects of this year, but all this could change when
Star Wars Episode 1: The Phantom Menace is released into theaters across the
country.
In the past, Brendan Fraser has played mainly comedic roles.  When playing
"George" in Disney's George of the Jungle, he was mainly not known by anyone. 
I would say that Gods and Monsters is the film that gave him a name, and now
The Mummy will give him a name amongst teens.  In The Mummy, Fraser gets to
play an action hero, and I liked him in this sort of role over the comedic
role, as in the films Blast From the Past and George of the Jungle.
Although Brendan Fraser is great, Rachel Weisz gives the best performance among
the cast.  Weisz really reminded me of a character from an old, horror film. 
The way she acts, looked, and talked all reminded me of someone not from this
time.  Evelyn is probably the only character that was likable, considering that
the other characters, like John Hannah's, didn't get much personal attention.
In many films, when different genres are mixed, the mixing usually works, and I
like it for the most part.  In The Mummy though, not all of the mixing works. 
There are some scenes that have a lot of potential horror, some with potential
comedy, some with potential drama, and some with potential pure action, but the
film tries to mix them together too often for the mixing to work.  The Mummy
could have gotten an
"A" rating from me if it had gone purely with one of these.  I didn't mind the
corny one-liners here and there during action sequences, but it certainly could
have done without them.  
The cinematography is amazing in The Mummy.  Particularly in one scene
depicting ancient Egypt, we are taken into a very fun portrayal of Egypt,
mummies, and the treasures left behind by the ancient Egyptians.  The costume
design in the film is also up there with the great cinematography.  From
ancient Egyptians outfits to original troops outfits, the costumes are always
top notch.
The Bottom Line- With The Mummy, the summer is off to its usually great start.

Title
Review for Matrix, The (1999)
While going into this film, I found myself asking the question that many were
probably asking- "What is the matrix?"  Never did I think walking into this
film The Matrix would turn out to be one of my favorite movies of all time. 
The trailers made the film look quite confusing, but the film cleared
everything up very simply and easily for me.  I was worried that the film would
be confusing just like Wing Commander, but I was wrong.  Because of the high
secrecy level about The Matrix, I will not reveal what the matrix is or what it
is even about.  The entire film is extremely unpredictable, and I do not want
to ruin this one of a kind film.
I will tell you this about The Matrix.  Laurence Fishburne is Morpheus, a
leader that is trying to overthrow the matrix.  He is one of few in his group
of people that is trying to do so.  Trinity, played by Carrie-Ann Moss, is one
of those people.  This group is out to find "the one", the one who can
overthrow the matrix.  They believe "the one" is Neo, a computer hacker, played
by Keanu Reeves.  In their quest to overthrow the matrix, they must battle
against "agents", people who are out to make sure the matrix isn't overthrown. 
Right now, it must sound very confusing, and much like a video game, but when
seeing the film, everything will be cleared up.  
The special effects are marvelous in The Matrix.  Some of the visual effects
are unlike any other I have ever seen.  They are very realistic and believable.
 Particularly, in a scene where Neo is trying to shoot down one of the agents,
the effects are highly original and outstanding.  In many films, the film
relies on special effects to make it good, but the special effects weren't even
half of what was so good about The Matrix.  Not only the effects in the film
are wonderful and top notch, but the music and sound is also astounding.  The
sound and effects together pretty much put you in the film itself.  The music
is upbeat and generation x, which is very similar to the music in Blade, only
much better.
The acting in The Matrix is perfect.  The characters of Neo and Trinity stood
out the most.  They are hardly developed at all, but you don't need development
when you have so many other great things to concentrate on.  Keanu Reeves is
very believable and dramatic as Neo, and he realistically acts out the pain and
confusion that Neo goes through.  Although Trinity is very silent through most
of the film, the character is still a lot of fun to watch.  Laurence Fisburne's
character was a very helpful one.  He explained what the matrix was so it could
be understood with somewhat ease.  The character of Morpheus was also a very
likable one.
The setting in The Matrix ranges from many different complex locations.  Places
contained outside the Matrix are very strange and dark, but at the same time
interesting and original.  I would not be surprised if The Matrix grabbed an
Academy Award nomination for Art Direction next spring.  It certainly deserves
one.  The costume design in The Matrix is quite simple, but simple means
perfect in this case.  Neo, Trinity, and Morpheus all wear a variety of
interesting outfits.  The agents all wear the identical outfit- a suit with a
wire connected to their ear.  They almost seem like villains from a video game.
Just to give you some idea of how much I loved this film, I would compare it to
Star Wars, one of my all time favorites.  Empire Strikes Back, the second Star
Wars film, which is another one of my favorites, is not as good as this wild
ride.  Not only is it a great movie, it is so much fun to watch.  The action
sequences are fast, exciting, and interesting.  With the special effects thrown
in, they are all the more dazzling.  The action sequences are without a doubt
the best action sequences I have ever witnessed in a film.  The Matrix is an
instant classic.  No science fiction movie since Star Wars has been as good and
original as this wonderful film.
The Bottom Line- Just like the "Matrix", this film is in a world of its own.

Title
Review for eXistenZ (1999)
http://members.aol.com/DeWyNGaLe
Wow.  eXistenZ, directed and written by David Cronenberg, was certainly a
surprise film for me.  This film just proves that trailers and hype don't mean
anything with a movie, because the cast was somewhat unfamiliar with me, and
the strange trailers were not too great, and I had hardly heard anything about
this little known film.  In eXistenZ, Jennifer Jason Leigh stars as famed
computer programmer Allegra Geller, who has just completed her latest game,
entitled eXistenZ.  Allegra's games are much different from anything that we
have out today, such as Nintendo 64 or PC games.  In Allegra's games, you are
put into virtual reality.  In order to participate in one of her games, you
must have a bio-port hole, which is a small hole inserted into your lower back.
 To get inside the state of the art game, an object called a pod must have its
cables inserted to your bio-port hole.
Allegra is very excited about eXistenZ.  At the premiere of the program, an
attempt to assassinate her takes place, which also damages the eXistenZ
program.  In fear that it is destroyed, Allegra must enter the program with
another person to see if everything is working properly.  A man named Ted Pikul
(Jude Law) becomes that person after he takes care of Allegra after she was
shot in the shoulder.  The two enter the program, and experience something they
never have before.  The program of eXistenZ puts you in a completely virtual
world, but it seems very realistic.  You do not know what the point of the game
is until you reach the end of the game.  From here, eXistenZ turns into one of
the most interesting and fun movies I have ever experienced, making my mind
become extremely involved with the content of the film.
The plot, much like the less superior film The Matrix, is twisted a little more
than in The Matrix.  It is much more fun, and it actually makes a lot more
sense than The Matrix ever did to me.  It is explained a lot better, and
certainly a lot more interestingly.  Although I loved The Matrix, eXistenZ is
just one step further than it in many ways.  What added the most to eXistenZ
was the extraordinary, well-done, surprising ending.  The film overall is just
a whole lot of fun, doing everything that was necessary to get you caught up in
it in just a ninety seven minute running time.  David Cronenberg certainly made
the best possible use of this time as he could.
This is the first movie that I have seen starring Jennifer Jason Leigh in, and
now I would like to see more of her performances.  She is great in eXistenZ,
making you believe every scene she is in.  Jude Law, whom I have only seen in
1997's Gattaca, was just as good in this as he was the 1997 overlooked film
with Uma Thurman.  Jude Law and Jennifer Jason Leigh are marvelous on screen
together, helping to create the reality of eXistenZ.  There are many supporting
performances which added to the film, including ones by Ian Holm, who played
Kiri, a man who helped fix the eXistenZ program pod, Willem Dafoe, who played
Gas, an evil character in the game, Sarah Polley, who played Merle, and Don
McKellar who played Yevgeny Nourish, another rarely seen character.  These
performances didn't have room to expand or go anywhere, but that's ok.  The
central focus was on Ted and Allegra, and that's what is the important here.
Special effects play an important part in the film.  Strange creatures, called
mutated reptiles, are very realistically done, and were very creative looking. 
The special effects aren't all pleasant in eXistenZ though.  Many disturbing
images are about in the film, making me shift in my seat or cover my eyes. 
That just goes to show how well done they were though!  The special effects,
put together with the acting and plot, make for an original, wild ride through
what games could be like in the coming years.  Could this become a true story
in the future?  Only time will tell.
The Bottom Line- I wish more movies were in existence like eXistenZ.

Title
Review for Wing Commander (1999)
WING COMMANDER by DeWyNGaLe    Rating: F
A few months before the release of Star Wars Episode 1, The Phantom Menace,
20th Century Fox decides to release another space film, that is a complete rip
off of Star Wars.  What is the point of this?  I do not know, but I wish it
hadn't been done, considering Wing Commander is definitely the year's worst
film so far.  To attract people to this horrible movie, they attached the full
trailer for The Phantom Menace.  Wing Commander will draw large crowds, because
this is the only film where you can find The Phantom Menace full trailer
attached at this time.  The trailer for The Phantom Menace was certainly the
best part of the movie experience I had tonight. 
Many people do not know that Wing Commander is based on a Star Wars computer
game.  I found this very interesting, considering this fact almost says that
Wing Commander is a Star Wars movie.  It is nowhere near the level of the Star
Wars films though.  Freddie Prinze Jr. stars in the film as Christopher Blair. 
Wing Commander was a huge mistake for Freddie.  This was definitely his worst
performance to date.  After January's She's All That, I actually saw a good
actor in Freddie, but now all those visions have been crushed. (For now
anyway.)  Christopher Blair is a pilot who is a part of the battle to stop the
Kilrathi, a group that is trying to destroy the earth.  Blair's parents also
fought in the space battles, and also died there.  His parents were pilgrims,
so many people disrespect him because of this.  Blair is under the command of
"Angel", played by Saffron Burrows, and he is friends with another pilot, Todd
"Maniac Marshall", played by Matthew Lillard.  Matthew Lillard seems to play
the same role in every movie, and he does in this one too.  His character as
Stu in 1996's Scream (A+), was a great one, but now, it seems like that same
role is being played again, only in a space movie.  The three are just a small
part of a large group trying to stop the Kilrathi before they take over earth. 
This plot is very flimsy, and doesn't give a whole lot to work with at all. 
This explains why Wing Commander drags on, seeming like there is no point to
any of the events that are going on.
The acting is horrible in Wing Commander.  Many lines seem out of place, and
are completely meaningless.  The acting and dialogue was so terrible, I even
found myself laughing at it.  The other things which are very bad about Wing
Commander are the special effects and the music.  The special effects are very
unrealistic.  When looking at two ships flying side by side, it is simple to
tell they are hanging and a blue screen is behind them.  The explosions look
very unrealistic as well.  A ship will be blown up, but there will only be fire
present four about one half of a second.  This is very unrealistic.  Music
pretty much accompanies the film the entire time.  The music also felt like
video game music, and it was very corny and annoying sounding.   
After we are given the plot, the film repeats itself for another hour, without
any plot twists, interesting scenes, or anything important to the film.  Blair
is forced to make jumps over other planets, and he must also fight against the
Kilrathi aircraft.  For the entire length of the movie, it takes place in
space.  It is truly like you are in a video game, because you are just watching
people shoot at each other in ships for a long, extended period of time.  It's
not much fun to watch at all.  If I wanted to watch people shoot at each other
in ships, I would go watch Star Wars at home.  At least Star Wars pays
attention to people, myth, feelings, and has some real plot to it.
The Bottom Line- Bring on The Phantom Menace 20th Century Fox!

Title
Review for Home Fries (1998)
Drew Barrymore has had a very good year.  First, she did The Wedding Singer
with Adam Sandler, and then she carried her own movie, Ever After.  Both were
huge winners at the box office.  Now she brings us Home Fries, a romantic
comedy costarring Catherine O'Hara and Luke Wilson.  Luke Wilson isn't the
biggest name in Hollywood or anything, but he is still a good actor.  He and
Barrymore are dating in real life, after meeting on the set of this cute movie.
Barrymore stars as Sally, a worker at a restaurant called Burger Matic.  She is
pregnant from the affair she had with a man named Henry.  Henry's son, Dorian
(Luke Wilson), and his other son, Angus (Jake Busey), accidentally kill their
father by giving him a heart attack.  Their mother put them up to this because
he had an affair with another woman.  On the radio in the helicopter, they hear
fast food workers on interference and figure that they know.  So, Dorian gets a
job at Burger Matic, the same place where Sally works, the woman who had an
affair with his father.  OK, right now, you are probably very lost, but so was
I.  As the movie goes on, Dorian and Sally fall in love, not knowing that Sally
is also in love with Dorian's father.
When Dorian's mother (Catherine O'Hara) commands Angus and Dorian to kill
Sally, (she finds out from pictures who the woman is) Dorian must stop them
before the love of his life is killed.  Home Fries has a very weird and
original plot, not like any other movie I have ever seen.  That really boosts a
movie to a high level.  Drew Barrymore gives an outstanding performance, her
best since Scream.  This movie should boost Luke Wilson to a star level. 
Catherine O'Hara gives a very fake performance that was hard to believe.  Jake
Busey was very annoying and I wanted him to  go away.  Shelley Duvall did
great, and you really believed how her character was feeling.  Home Fries was
also suspenseful in it's own way.  I wanted certain things to happen and I
couldn't tell if they were going to or not.  
There were a lot of laughs in Home Fries, but not crack up funny ones.  Home
Fries is a cute, small movie, which should make some pretty good money at the
box office, but it wont be a blockbuster.  It should keep some people just
entertained.  It is a very simple movie, nothing really complex about it
(except the plot).  Home Fries was a really nice movie to watch on
Thanksgiving, and I enjoyed it a lot.

Title
Review for Pushing Tin (1999)
http://members.aol.com/DeWyNGaLe
20th Century Fox is now on a roll.  This year, they have released many of what
I call "could have been great" films that have had everything in place to make
an outstanding, one of a kind film.  Pushing Tin is just another to add to the
list.  The main element in this film that could have made it an A' film is the
wonderful cast.  John Cusack, Academy Award nominee Cate Blanchett, Academy
Award winner Billy Bob Thornton, and Golden Globe winner Angelina Jolie are the
key cast in this comedy/drama about the occupation of air traffic controlling.
John Cusack stars as Nick Falzone, an air traffic controller.  He is the best
at his station, and everyone admires his wonderful work of saving lives all day
long.  Nick is at a great stage in his life.  He is very happy in his marriage
with Connie, played by Cate Blanchett, whom he has two kids with.  One day, all
of that changes.  A new air traffic controller is introduced to his station. 
His name is Russell Bell (Billy Bob Thornton), and is top notch as well.  Nick
starts competing with him right off the bat.  For the rest of the film, the two
compete to see who is the better man.  Sometimes this is funny, but sometimes
it can be very dramatic as well.
At first it is all fun between the two, but then things start to turn bad. 
Nick finds himself losing everything he had.  He even cheats on Connie with
Russell's alcoholic wife, Mary, played by Angelina Jolie.  From the point where
this takes place, the film goes into more of a serious, suspense-drama mode
than the more fun, light, comedic mood.
The entire concept of Pushing Tin was based on a magazine article about an air
traffic controller.  It was neat to see such an interesting insight to this
overlooked job.  It's not often I walk away from a film knowing a lot more
about a subject than I did to begin with.  The 3-D scenes that the film goes
into makes the concept of air traffic controlling seem pretty simple.  I
thought this was very cleverly done.
The writing in Pushing Tin is absolutely horrible.  There are so many scenes
that don't serve any purpose at all to the overall film.  At least twenty
minutes of footage could have been cut from the film.  If scenes like the
pointless seven or eight-minute bomb scene were cut, the film would have been
much better.  Due to the amount of pointless scenes, the film dragged a lot. 
The running time is only two hours and hour minutes, but yet it seems like it
was three hours long.
Other than the writing, everything is okay in the film.  The sound really added
a lot to the film.  The sounds of airplanes send off vibrations that you can
feel.  The filmmakers turned down the sound at the right times and pumped it up
right when it was perfect to do so.
The strongest part in the film without a doubt was the outstanding
performances.  John Cusack, who has not been seen in a leading role since
1997's Midnight in the Garden of Good and Evil, gives the best performance I
have ever sen him give.  He got to go a lot of places with this character, and
he took full advantage of that.  Billy Bob Thornton is good in Pushing Tin, but
it is a step down from the wonderful flick, A Simple Plan. (A-) Thornton's
character just kind of sat there silent for the majority of the film, and it
would have been nice to hear some more from him.  Also taking a step down is
Cate Blanchett, who perfected her role in the masterpiece Elizabeth. (A+) She
is very good here as well, but she doesn't get a lot of room to develop her
character too much.  Angelina Jolie, who was last seen in another one of 1998's
best, Playing by Heart (A-), pretty much plays the same role as she did in
Playing by Heart.  We didn't get to se her as much though, which was a
disappointment.
The Bottom Line- The writer of this could have been great film were "pushing"
it a little bit.

Title
Review for Out of Sight (1998)
George Clooney, Jennifer Lopez, Ving Rhames, and Steve Zhan star in the comedy
about a bank robber.  George Clooney stars as Jack Foley, a professional bank
robber.  He has robbed over 200 banks in his time.  He has been caught a few
times, and he has been sent to jail a few times.  One night at the jail, he and
a couple of buddies plan an escape from the jail.  Ving Rhames plays Buddy, the
man who has a car waiting for Jack and the other two escaping with him.  Buddy
isn't the only one waiting for Jack and company that night.  Federal Marshall
Karen Sisco, played by Jennifer Lopez, is there ready to make the bust.  Jack
makes it out of the jail, but the other two are shot dead.  Buddy and Jack
shove Karen into the trunk of the car to make sure she doesn't make the bust. 
Jack stays in the trunk with her, and they discuss many things, including life
and movies.
At a gas station, they see Glenn, an old pal, played by Steve Zhan.  They put
Glenn in the car also, so no information gets out.  Jack and Buddy step out of
the car to discuss the plan on what they are going to do, and while this
happens, Karen persuades Glenn to drive away, getting away from Jack and Buddy.
 Now, Jack and Buddy must find Glenn, and Karen must find Jack and Buddy. 
Karen asks Jack's ex-wife about where Jack may be, and doesn't find out much
information there.  
Karen sees Jack around as she looks for him, and doesn't do anything, acts like
he isn't there.  When they do meet up, they talk, and she doesn't try to arrest
him or anything.  She discovers that she is in love with the man she has to
take to jail.  He loves her to, and doesn't want to hurt her.
Karen also has to find Glenn now as well.  She remembers him saying he was
going to Detroit, so she suspects she might find Glenn, as well as Jack and
Buddy there.  At a boxing match, she catches Glenn trying to steal a car from
the parking lot.  She lets him go, because she has better things to do than to
make a bust.  She learns from Glenn that the plan is to go to Richard Ripley's
house, played by Albert Brooks.  Ripley has five point two million dollars
worth of uncut diamonds, and everyone is after them.  Little does Glenn know
that Jack, Buddy, and the others they met up with, changed the plan to stealing
the diamonds that same night, so Glenn wouldn't tell anyone.
Jack, Buddy, and the others go to Ripley's house to get the uncut diamonds. 
The maid answers the door, and the four of them bust into the house.  Little do
they know that Karen is sitting outside ready to make a bust.  Jack finds the
diamonds on his own, and gives them to Buddy to drive off with.  The others
with Jack assume that Jack and Buddy are trying to rip them off, but they
aren't.  Snoopy, (one of the others with them), played by Don Cheadle and Jack
get in a fight, but Karen ends it by entering the house and shooting Snoopy
dead.  She doesn't want to hurt Jack, because they are in love.  The ending is
also surprising and well done.
Out Of Sight is a cheaply made film, but price doesn't mean anything.  Out Of
Sight is without a doubt one of the best, most original films of 1998.  All of
the acting was done wonderfully, the plot was developed, and the setting was
great and realistic.  George Clooney and Jennifer Lopez do outstanding jobs as
their characters, and they make you believe that they are real people.  Samuel
L. Jackson and Michael Keaton also make short cameos in which they do a good
job of acting in.  I wish that more people would see Out Of Sight, because of
how good it was.  It was a little confusing at times, but that doesn't make
much of a difference when you have such a great film.  All in all, Out Of
Sight, is definitely out of sight. 

Title
Review for You've Got Mail (1998)
Meg Ryan is Kathleen Kelly, the owner of the cute children's book store, Shop
Around The Corner.  It is a business that has been going on for years, and was
previously owned by her mother.  Kathleen is a sweet, funny, nice type of
person who loves kids.  One of her favorite things to do is log on to American
Online.  Her screen name is ShopGirl.  She chats with someone named NY152 every
day, and they are the greatest of friends.  They don't go into specifics, but
they just have a simple friendship.  But now, The Shop Around The Corner is
having a problem.  A store called Fox Books has moved in right across the
street!  It is owned by Joe Fox. (Tom Hanks) This store is huge, with many
floors of books and magazines.  Their goal is to put every bookstore in New
York City out of business.
Joe Fox also loves American Online.  There, he chats with a girl named
ShopGirl.  They are the best of friends but they don't take their friendship
into specifics.  He knows nothing about her.  His screen name is NY152.  He
meets Kathleen Kelly at The Shop Around The Corner when he is trying to buy out
their inventory of books that Fox Books doesn't have.  He simply states his
name is Joe.  They continue to meet around the city and she discovers that he
is Joe Fox, the man that is going to put her out of business.  The two of them
still don't know that they are in love on America  Online.  They fight and
fight and fight whenever they see each other.  These arguments are quite
humourous.  
NY152 asks ShopGirl if they should meet.  They plan to meet at the Coffee Shop.
 ShopGirl is waiting and waiting at a table with a present for NY152.  When
NY152 discovers that ShopGirl is Kathleen Kelly, he freaks out, for he is Joe
Fox.  He enters the coffee shop not telling her who he is.  He simply sits down
and annoys her to death. He doesn't mean to, but she takes it that way.  Now
that he knows that they are actually perfect for each other, he is extra nice
to her.  The next day he brings her flowers and stays in her apartment and
chats with her for awhile. Eventually, he asks ShopGirl to meet again over
America Online.  They do, and they discover that they were in love the entire
time.  Kathleen simply states "I wanted it to be you."
You've Got Mail is a nice, cute movie with some good laughs.  Tom Hanks and Meg
Ryan are so wonderful together.  Both did great jobs of acting.  You've Got
Mail shows that sometimes if you look beyond the business in people, they may
be just right for you.  Although at some points in the movie, it seemed a
little slow, the overall product was great.  Warner Brothers is out of the
slump and definitely has a hit.  America Online is supporting this movie a
great deal.  They even have a feature where you can E-Mail Tom Hanks and Meg
Ryan under their screen names in the movie.  Parker Posey, Dave Chapelle, and
Greg Kinnear also have smaller supporting rolls.  Parker Posey plays Joe's
girlfriend, Dave Chapelle plays his friend, and Greg Kinnear plays Kathleen's
boyfriend.  The bottom line: Not Oscar Material, but a wonderful movie for all
of you AOL lovers out there.

Title
Review for Never Been Kissed (1999)
NEVER BEEN KISSED by DeWyNGaLe    Rating: A
http://members.aol.com/DeWyNGaLe
Drew Barrymore has come a long, long way in her life.  Her parents were very
famous actors, and they were well known for classic movies.  At first, Drew
Barrymore seemed like she wasn't going to go anywhere with her career in
acting.  In my opinion, her breakthrough movie was 1996's Scream (A+), where
she played a small role, but also a great role.  Next Drew went on to co star
with Adam Sandler in 1998's the Wedding Singer (B+), where she was good but
didn't get the chance to show off her skills.  Later on in 1998, with Ever
After (A-), Drew was almost able to carry the movie by herself, but not without
help from Angelica Huston.  Now, in Never Been Kissed, Drew has gotten the
opportunity to show off her stuff.  After coming through a hard childhood, Drew
has finally gotten the title of "great actress" in my opinion.
In Never Been Kissed, Drew stars as Josie Gellar, a journalist at the Chicago
Sun Times.  At the Chicago Sun Times, things are a little slow, and they need a
really good story.  Josie is picked to do the story, and she is now a reporter.
 The task is a hard but fun one- Josie must enroll in high school to study
today's teenagers and schools in America.  There is only one pressure holding
Josie back from the job.  When Josie was in high school, she was the class
outcast, and she had the nickname "Josie Grossie."  She barely had any friends
at all, but she held on to become successful after high school.
Josie decides to take her chances.  On the first day of school, everything goes
horrible.  She makes a fool of herself in front of everyone, including the
popular people who remind her of some people back when she was in high school. 
Everyone finds her to be very strange the first day, so she must try harder to
be a teen again.  Josie's brother Rob, played by David Arquette, is a worker at
the Tiki Post, a place for office supplies.  He realizes that this story is
very important to her, and he must help her out.  He enrolls in high school to
help Josie, and also plans to fulfil his dreams of playing baseball in college.
 Rob becomes popular instantly, and he knows that if he puts the good word in
for Josie, they will accept her as well.
Never Been Kissed may not highly original, but Drew Barrymore, who also
produces the film, did such a wonderful job as Josie Gellar.  She created one
of the most likable characters I have ever seen in a movie.  Drew is funny as
Josie, and is also very emotional and realistic.  On the other hand, Kirsten,
Gibby, and Kristen, who are the mean, popular girls played by Jessica Alba,
Jordan Ladd, and Marley Shelton do a good job as well, but characters are very
unlikable.  A performance which was surprisingly strong was that of Leelee
Sobieski's as Aldys, a girl who becomes friends with Josie at the high school.
In many films today, sub-plots are what ruin many of them.  That's not the case
in Never Been Kissed.  There are quite a few sub-plots containing plots similar
to Message In A Bottle, EDTV, and even Carrie.  Molly Shannon, who is involved
in one of the sub-plots, is very funny as Anita, a worker at the Chicago Sun
Times.
On the trailers, it looked like Never Been Kissed would be a laugh riot, but it
was so much more than that.  It was very funny, but also inspirational, sad,
and meaningful.  There are so many unexpected elements in the movie, and that's
what makes it fun all the way through.  The scenes that were supposed to make
you laugh made you crack up, and the scenes that were supposed to make you
think made you really think.  It is very rare a film does either one of these,
but Never Been Kissed certainly succeeded.  

Title
Review for Curve, The (1998)
http://members.aol.com/DeWyNGaLe
So many students strive to get into schools such as Harvard of Princeton, but
they just don't get the good grades.  So many students would do ANYTHING to
reach their goal of getting into this schools.  Legend has it that if your
roommate commits suicide, the remaining roommates will get an automatic 4.0. 
Chris (Michael Vartan) and Tim (Matthew Lillard) are two guys who really want
the 4.0 to get into Harvard.  How far will they go to get their 4.0?
Chris and Tim are also roommates with Rand, played by Randall Batinkoff.  The
two scheme to murder Rand, make it look like a suicide, so they can supposedly
get their 4.0.  They have heard this rumor many places, and they are willing to
take the chance to find out.  Rand is a very, very mean person.  He treats his
girlfriend Natalie, played by Tamara Craig Thomas, like she doesn't matter at
all.  She is very afraid of him, and she especially afraid now that she must
tell him she is pregnant.  She does tell him, and he becomes enraged.  That
night would be the last night of Rand's life.  Tim and Chris give Rand a bottle
of rat poison, making him think that it is beer.  Rand drinks down the poison,
and then dies.  Now, Tim pushes him off of a mountain with a suicide note near
the site to make it look like he killed himself.
It does not take long until the suicide note is found, but the body isn't
found.  The police question Chris and Tim about Rand to try and find any
information.  Feeling extreme guilt, Chris is having a very hard time,
especially with his girlfriend, Emma, played by Keri Russell.  She wants to
know more, but he will not even speak with her.  Will he give in?  Will Tim
turn Chris in?  Will Chris turn Tim in?  Will they turn themselves in?  All of
these questions were running through my mind while watching this slick suspense
film.
The events in The Curve are very surprising, original, and fun.  The plot
sounds much like Dead Man on Campus, but that is not the deal with this film. 
This film is a very serious one, with not many laughs.  There are many twists
and turns that make this film different from most films.  The ending in
particular is completely unpredictable and satisfying.  It is a terrific,
suspenseful ending that I could never predict would happen.  Hands down to Dan
Rosen who wrote this wild ride.  The sound really stood out in the film.  It is
quite eerie and it really adds to the feel of the film.  The way the movie is
filmed is also great.  All of the technical aspects, as well as the acting and
directing aspects are very well done. 
The performances in The Curve are very good.  Matthew Lillard gets to play
another creepy role, just like in 1996's Scream. (A+) He is very strange in
this film as well.  I like him in this sort of role, rather than the roles he
has been playing in comedies such as Senseless and She's All That.  Michael
Vartan is fantastic as Chris, who has extremely mixed emotions about the entire
murder and the 4.0.  Michael Vartan was also superb in Never Been Kissed, where
he co-starred with Drew Barrymore as a teacher who fell in love with his
student.  Keri Russell also gives a great performance.  She should be a good
actress in the horror department of the film.  Tamara Craig Thomas is also
realistic, especially coping with the death of her boyfriend.  Some very strong
supporting performances came from smaller roles, such as Bo Dietl and Anthony
Griffith who play two detectives investigating the case.
The Bottom Line- I might just have to curve that A- into an A.
*Note- The Curve premiered at the Sundance Film Festival in early 1998.  It was
decided the film would not be released widely.  It is now available at
Blockbuster Video only, and for rent only.  See you at the video store!   

Title
Review for Buffalo '66 (1998)
Buffalo 66 is a very rarely known movie that stars Vincent Gallo and Christina
Ricci.  Gallo plays a very troubled man, who was sent to jail for gambling. 
Once out of jail, he must visit his parents, who he told he was married.  The
truth is he isn't married.  To try to impress them, he kidnaps a girl
(Christina Ricci) from a tap dancing class to act as his wife.  The film is
very cheaply made, and it shows it throughout a lot of the movie, but you don't
need money to make a good film.  Buffalo 66 doesn't always stay with the
realistic concept, and sometimes goes through outrageous events.
Gallo's parents, played by Angelica Huston and Ben Gazarra, are two very
strange individuals.  The mother plays a football fanatic and the father plays
a quiet man with odd habits.  Gallo and Ricci arrive at his parent's house, and
some extremely funny scenes take place within the house.  Ricci's performance
during the scene at Gallo's parent's home are very well done.  There is
constantly humor involved in the interesting dinner table scenes.  The way the
movie was filmed in this particular part of the movie were interesting and
creative.  They seemed very mediocre, but they worked out just fine.
Gallo's character is developed very well.  The impression that he is very
depressed and confused is very clear.  Gallo gives a performance that makes you
believe what the character is going through.  His character goes through many,
many problems, just like many people in real life.  This character seemed very
realistic to me.  Ricci's character is funny and different.  She doesn't care
much that she has been kidnaped, in fact, she falls in love the man who
kidnaped her!  Ricci is a very wonderful actress and she is starting to get the
recognition that she deserves.
Buffalo 66 isn't all laughs though.  Many scenes are very dramatic and
depressing.  Gallo's character was so realistic, he was extremely disturbing. 
Some scenes are supposed to come off as funny, but they actually seemed sad and
real to life.  The film sometimes drags along, not giving much material.  I
really would have liked to see Gallo's parents a lot more, and I would have
liked to see the characters developed more.  Overall, Buffalo 66 isn't as good
as some people put it up to be.
The Bottom Line- A few hysterical scenes save this film from sinking to the
bottom.

Title
Review for Rage: Carrie 2, The (1999)
THE RAGE: CARRIE 2 by DeWyNGaLe    Rating: A-
Around twenty-two years ago, a movie starring Sissy Spacek, Piper Laurie, and
Amy Irving was released about a girl with telekinesis that was driven to the
edge, called Carrie.  It was nominated for a couple of Academy Awards, a Golden
Globe, and Sissy Spacek won the National Society of Film Critic's Award for
Best Actress.  Twenty two years later, a sequel to the classic has been made. 
I found myself asking the question before the movie, "Isn't it too late for a
sequel?"  After seeing such a great movie, I don't think it was.
Emily Bergl shines as Rachel, the sister of Carrie.  Rachel has telekinesis,
just like her sister did.  She does not want to admit to it, she just covers it
up by saying objects fell because she bumped them off the table or another
excuse.  When Rachel was a little girl, her mom was admitted to an institution
for the insane.  She had to witness her mom get taken away, and some very
strange events things, such as windows opening and shutting violently occurred
when she was mad.  She was forced to go to a foster home after her mom left,
because she did not have a dad at the time.  Growing up, Rachel has had to deal
with all the weird things that go in with her telekinesis.
Rachel has many problems at school.  She isn't popular, or with the in-crowd,
and she doesn't have many friends.  Many people make fun of her, and don't
bother to talk to her or be near her.  Her best friend is Lisa, played by Mena
Suvari.  They seem to be the two outcasts of the school.  Rachel is made fun of
a lot by the popular people. 
After Lisa commits suicide, Rachel becomes very angered.  Lockers and doors
shut instantly when Rachel sees the sight of her dead best friend.  No one
knows why this happened, but it was due to Rachel's telekinesis.  Having to
cope with the loss, Rachel sees Sue Snell, played by Amy Irving, the guidance
counselor, who reprises her role as Sue from the first Carrie film.  Sue
confirms that Rachel has telekinesis, and she also confirms that she is Carrie
White's sister.
Rachel's breaking point in the film is at a party at Mark's, played by Dylan
Bruno, who is one of the popular people.  Mark is involved in a setup to pull
Rachel away from Jesse, another popular boy, played by Jason London, that all
the popular kids are in.  They all act like they like Rachel, and Rachel
finally feels like she fits in.  At the party though, she discovers the truth
and beings very enraged, and as a result, some very suspenseful and eerie
scenes follow.  Rachel uses her telekinesis to get back at the kids who are
making fun of her the best that she can.
The Rage is somewhat predictable, but it is still fun to watch.  There are a
few suspenseful scenes, and also a few very frightening and disturbing images. 
The sound adds to the creepiness of the film, with loud effects at the right
time to make you jump out of your seat.  The house at which Mark's party took
place in was a little extreme, but it was still a fun place to have a rage.
In comparison to other recent horror films, The Rage is better by far.  When
viewing trailers for The Rage, I was expecting another teenager movie that
would have a lot of blood and gore and barely any plot, but I was wrong.  It
completely surprised me.  The Rage and In Dreams both had a similar feel to
them, but I think that In Dreams was a little more clever, but certainly not as
fun.  I am glad to see this form of horror taking place more, rather than the
slasher plot line for movies.
The Rage: Carrie 2 is Emily Bergl's first film, and it certainly is a great one
for her.  She is very believable.  She handles the scenes where telekinesis is
kicking in very realistically and well.  The character of Rachel is developed
very deeply, and it is almost like we have known this character for a long
time.  We are given background on her, which is usually something film's don't
give anymore.  Amy Irving was also great as Sue Snell.  It was very neat to see
someone from the original Carrie return for the sequel.  The acting from the
popular crowd, which included Rachel Blanchard, Zachery Ty Bryan, Charlotte
Lopez, and others, all did very nicely, and were all very mean characters. 
Although they weren't developed, they added to the film.
The Bottom Line: Although the larger are "all going to laugh at this", this
smaller critic didn't.

Title
Review for Living Out Loud (1998)
LIVING OUT LOUD by DeWyNGaLe    Rating: B+
http://members.aol.com/DeWyNGaLe
Living Out Loud is the tale of adults and what life is like for them in their
middle age years.  It portrays life realistically, not like some other films
do.  Judith Nelson, played by Holly Hunter, is the center of attention in this
film.  Judith is a woman who has been recently separated from her husband who
was cheating on her while they were married.  She now lives alone, and doesn't
have a lot to do.  She loves to watch her favorite singer, Liz Bailey, played
by Queen Latifah perform.  She also likes to meet people and talk to people. 
She likes to observe others.  One night coming home, she meets a man who runs
the elevator.  His name is Pat, and he is played by the very talented actor
Danny DeVito.  They get to talking and Judith comes to find out that he
recently lost his daughter.  Out of sympathy, she invites him for coffee, and
the two get to know each other.  Throughout the film, the two become close
friends.  Judith also forms a friendship with Liz after one of her
performances.  The rest of the film just shows these three interesting people
and what goes on in their day to day lives.
The relationship between Pat and Judith is so realistic and developed.  Pat
falls in love with Judith, but she does not have the same feelings for him. 
The two continue to get to know each other and end up being the closest of
friends.  Judith is glad she has another friend, but she still isn't happy with
her life.  She doesn't want her life to be wasted.  She wants to live her life
fully.  She decides she doesn't want to be with a man, because then someone
will be stopping her from doing what she is trying to do with her life.  On the
other hand, the divorced Pat feels completely differently.  He wants to spend
the rest his life with Judith.
Living Out Loud is one of the best comedies of the year.  There isn't much to
the cinematography or the sound to this one, but it is a very open, true to
life comedy, which makes it all the funnier. Some of the funniest sequences in
the movie are when Judith starts daydreaming about the way she pictures things,
or the way she wants life to be.  Sometimes these daydreams are not so funny
though, but they are very sad and emotional.  Judith is very open to life, and
that's what makes her one of the best characters in a movie I have seen in
awhile.
The best thing in Living Out Loud is the fact that the adults portrayed in the
film are very real to life.  They seem like middle-aged people are, rather than
characters that seem like they are still very young.  Danny DeVito in
particular played his part very realistically.  His character of Pat was a very
likable one, and also one that you sympathized for very easily.  Holly Hunter's
character was also a great one that brought tons of laughs.  She was a very
interesting person, and that's what made the character all the more likable. 
Holly Hunter was wonderful as Judith.  Judith was a character that had suffered
many hardships in her life.  All of the characters, including Queen Latifah's
Liz, are extremely interesting people.  There isn't much plot in Living Out
Loud.  It doesn't really seem like the film is a film at all, but more of a
documentary on real life people.  It seemed like I was watching these people
secretly, without them knowing it.
The Bottom Line- A true to life, emotional film about people that almost seem
real. Not actors.

Title
Review for Office Space (1999)
http://members.aol.com/DeWyNGaLe
Beavis and Butthead was one of the most popular shows on television for the
longest time.  Parents did not approve of the crude humor, but no one seemed to
care.  The show went on to turn out a hit movie, Beavis and Butthead Do
America. (A-) The phenomenon was quickly stopped when the MTV show was
canceled.  Mike Judge, the creator of the show went on to make another hit show
King of the Hill, but soon that lost popularity as well.  Well, Mike Judge is
back with Office Space, which he wrote and directed.
The style of comedy used in Office Space is one of my favorites- sarcastic
comedy.  Ron Livingston, played by Peter Gibbons, is an employee at Initech, a
computer company.  His boss Bill, played by Gary Cole, is very laid back and
kind of "clueless."  Ron is not the type that likes to work at all.  He pretty
much just sits around on the job, not doing anything he is told to.  Other
employees at Initech include the very funny Milton, played by Stephen Root, who
is always getting excluded from everyone else, Michael Bolton, played by David
Herman, and Samir, played by Ajay Naidu.  
Ron is not happy with the fact that he has to be in a cubicle all day long.  He
feels trapped.  After going to a therapist, he realizes that he needs to be
care free and not do what other people expect of him.  He takes this advice way
to seriously, and plots to take much money from Initech.  He gathers other
employees at the job to help him with his clever plan, which could land him in
jail.  From here, the film sort of goes into a theme that I didn't like.  It
takes about half of the film to get into this plot, and I wish it would have
stayed the way it was the first half.  The first half was a realistic look at
work today, and I found it hysterical.  
All of the performances in Office Space are very funny, especially Gary Cole's.
 Peter is also very funny as the rebelling office worker who will do whatever
he wants.  One of the best performances comes from Jennifer Aniston as Joanna,
a waitress who works nearby Initech.  She meets Ron, and the two start dating. 
The relationship between Ron and Joanna was underused, and really could have
added a lot to the overall film.  Jennifer Aniston is often underused in films.
 She should get a good role one of these days, because she has a lot of talent
as an actress.  
Sometimes Office Space can be very cheesy.  Sometimes dialogue doesn't work or
some scenes seem very out of place.  Office Space also has a problem that many,
many films have today.  It was quite a forgettable film, and certainly not one
that I will look back on at the end of the year and think of it as one of the
funniest films of the year.  It is just another nice, simple film with some
good laughs.  There are so many comedies that are the same way today.  I am
getting sick of all these mediocre comedies.  Fortunately, Office Space didn't
feel as empty as a lot of the other comedies coming out.  The characters got to
be very likable, and we actually got to know them pretty well.
The Bottom Line- Yet another so-so comedy to add to the long, ongoing list.  

Title
Review for 200 Cigarettes (1999)
200 CIGARETTES by DeWyNGaLe    Rating: D+
200 Cigarettes takes place on New Year's Eve 1981.  Monica, played by Martha
Plimpton is having a huge New Year's party.  Everyone in town is trying to get
there, but some are caught up in other things.  This is the basic plot of 200
Cigarettes.  As we meet the characters headed towards the party, we are sent
into many subplots which are unoriginal, and not interesting at all.  This
disappointed me greatly.  The film should have been more about the party than
the people trying to get there in my opinion.
Lucy, played by Courtney Love, is with Kevin, played by Paul Rudd.  The two are
in a relationship that is more of a friendship, but starts to blossom into
something more than that.  This subplot is extremely boring and dull, and I am
getting quite sick of plots like that.  Janeane Garofalo is involved in another
subplot, dealing with Kevin.  She plays Ellie, an ex-girlfriend of Kevin's. 
This subplot is completely a waste of Garofalo's talent.  There was no point to
it at all, and it was hardly even in the movie.  When Lucy runs into a
bartender, played by Ben Affleck, another subplot is formed.  The bartender is
invited by Lucy to come to Monica's party.  At the bar, he runs into two more
girls.  The girls are played by Angela Featherstone and Nicole Parker, but
unfortunately, due to the terrible acting of both of them, I don't even
remember their characters names.  Ben Affleck is a good actor, but his
character doesn't go anywhere so he doesn't have much screen time to give a
good performance.  Featherstone and Parker are horrible in their roles, and
they are part of the reason the film is so bad.  
Christina Ricci plays Val, and Gaby Hoffman plays Stephie.  The two girls are
trying to get to the party but are extremely lost.  They meet some guys and end
up going around with them all night.  This subplot was alright, but it was
quite annoying with Stephie's accent.  Hoffman did an okay job of acting, but
Ricci did good.  She was underused, considering she is such a wonderful
actress.
Another subplot in the film is the relationship between Cindy, played by Goldie
Hawn's daughter, and Jack, played by Jay Mohr.  Jack is an actor who doesn't
care about the girls he goes out with, he just likes dates for one night, and
the next day he doesn't.  Kate Hudson is a huge klutz.  She gets herself into
very funny situations, that are the funniest parts in the entire movie.  They
are probably the only funny parts in the entire movie as well.  This subplot
could have been used more, mainly due to Hudson's performance.  Mohr wasn't
good, but he wasn't bad.  He was just alright, which I didn't find acceptable. 
There is not much to say about the performances in the film.  None of the
characters are developed or shown enough to really tell if the acting is good
or not.  The only performances that I can judge are Christina Ricci's as always
good performance, Kate Hudson's funny role, Courtney Love's mediocre
performance, and Paul Rudd's annoying and overused performance.  I was hoping
for a little more out of Jaw Mohr, Ben Affleck, Casey Affleck, Gaby Hoffman,
Dave Chapelle, and especially out of Janeane Garofalo.
The two strongest things in the film were the great soundtrack and the original
costumes.  Martha Plimpton and Christina Ricci had very different and original
outfits which made me feel like I was in the year 1981.  The soundtrack is full
of 1980's tunes, ranging from "I Want Candy" to "Tainted Love."  The songs in
the movie also helped create the feel that you were back in the 1980s.
During the film, I often found myself asking the questions, "Is there a reason
to this?  Is there any moral story?  Is there a point?  Are any of the events
going on in the film necessary?  Do I care what Lucy and Kevin are going
through?"  The movie is extremely boring, and by the time they reached
eleven-o-clock, one hour before midnight, I could not wait for the movie to be
over.  The plot is okay, but the subplots make it terrible.  Maybe if the film
was about the party, not about the people at the party, it could have been a
lot better. 
The Bottom Line: Just like a slasher movie, this 80s comedy is just one too
many.

Title
Review for Out-of-Towners, The (1999)
THE OUT OF TOWNERS by DeWyNGaLe    Rating: B-
http://members.aol.com/DeWyNGaLe
Goldie Hawn and Steve Martin are two of today's biggest names in comedy.  Both
of them are well-known for movies such as The First Wive's Club (Hawn), Shampoo
(Hawn), Father of the Bride (Martin), and The Jerk (Martin).  Mix these two
comics together and what do you get?  The Out of Towners.  The Out of Towners
is a remake of the 1970 classic starring Jack Lemmon and Sandy Dennis.  With
such a great cast this time around, how could it fail?  Well, I was worried it
was, but I was not let down.
Goldie Hawn and Steve Martin are Nancy and Henry Clark, a middle aged couple
from Ohio.  Right now, they are experiencing hard times because their son
(Oliver Hudson) just went off to college.  Their daughter is also away, so they
are living by themselves now.  They look at it in two ways.  1. They have more
time to themselves.  2. They will be lonely without their kids.  Another
problem the two are facing is one that Henry is keeping from Nancy- that he has
been fired.  He most go to an interview for a job in New York City, and when
Nancy tags along unexpectedly, the two are off for an adventurous, wild ride
through the vast place they call New York City.
Things get off to a bad start when their bags turn up lost after arriving in
New York City.  What occurs from here is incident after incident that puts the
two into more and more trouble.  They have no money, no bags, and the police
are even after them.  Whenever they try to get themselves out of trouble, they
just get burrowed into it more and more and more.  
Goldie Hawn is the best part of the film.  Her dialogue is absolutely
hysterical.  She whines a lot, which makes for a lot of laughs.  I always enjoy
Goldie Hawn.  She has a way of making me laugh, just when I look at her.  As
more problems arise for Martin's character, he starts to go, well, crazy.  He
does make for some funny sequences when he becomes very stressed out, but some
of the comedy that comes from Martin is not funny, but obnoxious.  A scene in
which Martin takes a hallucinogenic is very well done and funny.  John Cleese
as Mr. Mersault is very funny and gives some unexpected laughs.  For the most
part, The Out of Towners humor is very well used.  In some parts of the film,
it starts to use the slapstick comedy method, which did not work for the type
of movie this was.  Some of the slapstick did work though.
One thing that I really didn't like about The Out of Towners that it wasn't
much different from anything else.  The events that take place are highly
predictable and overused in movies such as this one.  It was pretty
forgettable, and only after one week of seeing it, I am having a very hard time
writing a review for it.  This movie is not the type of movie teens would like.
 They are better off seeing movies such as She's All That or 10 Things I Hate
About You.  The movie won't really appeal to older audiences either,
considering the amount of slapstick comedy involved.  It won't even appeal to
little kids because of some of the more mature themes, violence and stealing,
will not be appropriate for them.  So who does this movie appeal to?  The
answer is: Pretty much no one.
The Bottom Line- The Out of Towners shouldn't be in town for long.  

Title
Review for Simple Plan, A (1998)
Bill Paxton, Billy Bob Thornton, and Bridget Fonda star as three people caught
up in murder, stealing, and lies in the new thriller A Simple Plan.  The hype
for this movie has been big, even back in November when it was originally
supposed to be released.  The all star cast is what will get most crowds to
flock to see this drama/thriller.  
Bill Paxton plays Hank, a happy guy with a wife, nice job, and a nice house. 
Bridget Fonda plays his wife, Sarah.  Sarah is pregnant, and the two must raise
money for the baby.  Hank and his brother Jacob, played by Billy Bob Thornton,
along with a friend Lou, played by Brent Briscoe are all out in the woods when
they discover a bag of money in a plane.  The plan is simple.  Hank will keep
the money until the plane is found, and when it is, and if no one is looking
for the money, the three will split the 4.4 million dollars contained in the
bag.  Hank must confront Sarah about what he has found, and the plan the three
men have made.  The money is taken care of by Hank throughout the movie, while
other events take place leading to the conclusion of the long story.  Hank has
to be especially careful considering he has the money in his home.  He is even
good friends with some police officers, which make his chance of getting caught
even higher.
A Simple Plan consists of a problem that many films have.  The characters are
too ignorant to take the money to the police right away, and as you have
probably guessed, many problems occur along the way.  The film is much like I
Know What You Did Last Summer, only the three men are the bad guys.  I almost
found myself rooting for the police in this one.  The characters besides Jacob
and Sarah are unlikable and underdeveloped.  
There are two key points that made A Simple Plan successful.  Although the
characters were unlikable, the performances were great.  The actors got you to
feel how you were supposed to about their roles.  The other thing that makes A
Simple Plan a winner is that the story is presented to the audience in a
creepy, original way.  The music and setting are what brought out the overall
presentation.  I thought the isolated woods were a great place to hold a tense
thriller like this one.
A Simple Plan keeps a tense pace, but it slows down in many scenes throughout
the movie.  Some of the unnecessary scenes could have been cut to maintain the
interest of the audience.  Bridget Fonda and Billy Bob Thornton give stand out
performances, stealing the scenes that they take part in.  Bill Paxton plays
the same character that he does in much of his movie roles, but still gives a
satisfying performance.  The actors in A Simple Plan put you in the character's
shoes.  They let you feel the horror that they were growing through.
The Bottom Line- The makers of A Simple Plan had a simple idea, but took it all
the way. 

Title
Review for Varsity Blues (1999)
Varsity Blues is just another high school sports movie.  Most of them aren't
very good, but Varsity Blues is different.  The key in Varsity Blues was
casting.  James Van Der Beek and Jon Voight lead the cast of Varsity Blues. 
The two play enemies- James Van Der Beek plays Jonathan Moxon, second string
football player, and Jon Voight plays the extremely mean football coach at
Canaan High School, Bud Kilmer.  Bud has coached football there for a number of
years.  He has mis treated many his players every year.  He doesn't care about
them at all, he just wants the championship.  He makes them play in sickness,
pain, or sadness.  He always takes his team to the championship, and he expects
to do it again this year.
He relies on star quarterback Lance Harbor, played by Paul Walker. Lance is the
typical movie sports star.  He is the best on the team, and he is always the
hero during the games.  The talent isn't all natural for Lance though,
considering that he takes steroids.  Jonathan, or Mox, (his nickname) discovers
that the coach is doing this.  This is your typical sports movie- the star of
the team is pet to the coach and the man who is better than the star is
absolutely hated by the coach.  Although it is unoriginal, Varsity Blues is
still a winner.  There are a lot of funny sequences, and there are well played
out dramatic sequences as well.  When Lance is sustains an injury that may put
him out of football for life, Mox is the teams only hope.  Coach Kilmer is
reluctant to play Mox, but has no choice.  Mox goes out there and shows coach
how it is done.  The football sequences that were filmed were done very nicely.
 They looked very realistic, and were put together very well.  It looked like
the cast was actually playing the game, and it wasn't coordinated.
Mox continues to win game after game for the Coyotes.  He likes being a star
now, but is very upset with the way Coach Kilmer treats the team.  His dad
(Thomas Duffy) is very proud of him.  He was a star in high school football as
well, and wants his two sons to do the same.  When Mox gets an academic
scholarship to Brown University, his dad is very upset.  He wants Mox to play
football all of his life.  Mox doesn't want to take after his dad, he wants to
live his own life.  James Van Der Beek gives an impressive acting performance
in these arguments with his father.  He made you believe the tough position
that Mox was in at that moment.
Mox's girlfriend, Julie, played by Amy Smart, isn't in to the whole football
craze.  She doesn't care about who wins or who loses or anything like that. 
Since Mox has become a football star, she has noticed a huge change in him.  He
is thinking more about himself than anyone else.  Amy Smart has not done many
movies, but in her role in Varsity Blues, she does a great job of dramatic
acting.  While all this drama is going on, Mox continues to win many games for
the Coyotes.  Coach Kilmer is very proud when Mox takes the team all the way to
the championship game.  During the game, Mox is very reluctant to play.  He
doesn't want to play for his dad and Kilmer.  He is sick of being controlled by
others.  The entire team agrees with what Mox is saying to them about Kilmer.
Varsity Blues is a teenager movie.  Most adults will probably dislike this
movie.  Laughs mixed with sad moments in Varsity Blues make it score big with
the teen audience.  Jon Voight gives a wonderful performance as Coach Kilmer. 
He did a great job of seeming evil, not caring about anyone but himself.  James
Van Der Beek tells us with Varsity Blues that he can handle the lead in a movie
as well as the lead on a hit television show.  Some of Varsity Blues wasn't all
that great, and that's the reason that adults won't like it.  It may not be the
type of movie that will win awards or anything close to it, but it was
certainly enjoyable, and that's enough for me.
The Bottom Line- The typical sports movie with some changes makes for a fun
time.

Title
Review for Forces of Nature (1999)
FORCES OF NATURE by DeWyNGaLe    Rating: B+
In the new romantic comedy Forces of Nature, Ben Affleck stars as Ben Holmes, a
writer who is getting ready to be wed to Bridget, played by Maura Tierney.  On
the night of Ben's bachelor party, which he isn't having a lot of fun at, his
dad suffers from a heart attack, which is one of the first signs that the
wedding should either be delayed or canceled.  His dad pulls through, but Ben
is still emotionally upset.  On the way to Savannah, Georgia, the location of
his wedding, an accident occurs involving the plane he is flying, sending them
into danger.  Everyone is alright, but the girl who was sitting next to Ben on
the plane, Sarah, played by Sandra Bullock, was knocked out in the accident. 
Ben takes her to help, and when she awakes she thinks of him as a life saver.  
>From here on out, Sarah and Ben see a lot of each other during the film. 
Bullock is also on her way to Savannah, Georgia to visit her son who she hasn't
seen in years.  She wants to sell her bagel shop she owns with her husband for
$25,000 to help pay for her young song's college when he becomes older.  Many
problems arise while Ben is trying to get to Savannah to get married, such as
trees hitting cars, not having money, and many other events that may be showing
signs that he shouldn't marry Bridget.  He becomes closer and closer to Sarah
the longer they are together with each other.  Ben is now two days late, and
Bridget is starting to take interest in another man other than Ben.  They both
feel bad for the actions they are taking part in, and still are determined to
pull this wedding off.  More and more obstacles send Ben out of the way of the
wedding, landing many funny moments for Bullock and Affleck.
Affleck and Bullock are really good together, although their relationship
wasn't quite as believable as they wanted it to be.  It was difficult to think
that a man would fall in love with another woman other than his fiancee after
two short, long days.  During the middle of the film, it is a pretty
predictable time while Ben and Sarah are traveling at almost all times.  The
last 3/4 of the film was wonderful.  It was a lot different that other romantic
comedies, and it felt like it was almost a different genre.  The last 3/4 led
to a very unpredictable, but realistic, ending which I was happy that they put
into the movie.  It was a big risk to have the ending they did, but it was
pulled off very realistically.
The characters of Ben and Sarah are a lot of fun to watch.  They are both
likable characters who have a lot of depth towards them.  Ben seemed to change
personalities a lot, which I didn't like much.  Affleck was still good, but not
on the same level as Bullock.  In my opinion, Bullock was extraordinary, and
she is definitely headed in the right track after making a few flops.  As a
result of the characters being likable, the suspense between the two was great.
 Because the characters were so well told, you could get into the movie really
easily and shout out things that you want them to do to be together.
A few scenes in Forces of Nature that I thought were very different and new
were a few scenes were rain was coming down.  The raindrops looked like
crystals falling from the sky.  They looked very fake, but it was also a very
neat thing to watch.  The other cinematography highlights in the film are the
beautiful sites that Ben and Sarah encounter on their journey to Savannah,
Georgia.  The sound in the film is also good.  The background music is
generally fast and upbeat, which really sets the mood for the way the
characters behave.  The trailers for the film made it look like Forces of
Nature would be a hysterical comedy, but I got more of a human emotions
comedy/drama.  I liked the fact a lot that they could make you laugh and also
make you think about decisions you will make in your own life at the same time.
The Bottom Line- A variation on the romantic comedy genre has finally strolled
around, and it's a hit.  

Title
Review for Pleasantville (1998)
PLEASANTVILLE by DeWyNGaLe    Rating: A+
http://members.aol.com/DeWyNGaLe
Many films have stuck people into virtual worlds or worlds that aren't their
own, but Pleasantville stands out from every one of those films.  Many complain
that Pleasantville is too much like The Truman Show, which stars Jim Carrey as
a man that does not know his life is being filmed.  I do not see the
resemblance between the two films at all.  Pleasantville is much different in
almost every way.  
David (Tobey Maguire) and Jennifer (Reese Witherspoon) are brother and sister. 
The two are teenagers that attend high school, who live in a town that is just
like any other town.  David is the kind of kid who likes to stay at home and
watch classic television show re-runs, and Jennifer is the type of kid who
likes to have fun and go on dates.  One night, the two are fighting over the
remote control and they end up destroying it.  Suspiciously, a T.V. repair main
(Don Knotts) comes to the door immediately after, without even being called. 
He gives them a new remote.  The two begin to fight again, when suddenly, they
are warped into the show of "Pleasantville."  Pleasantville is a 60s sitcom. 
Everything is perfect in the world.  It centers around one family, the Parkers.
 They are now Bud and Mary Sue Parker, the two children in the show
Pleasantville.  Their new parents are Betty (Joan Allen) and George. (William
H. Macy)
They conclude they must follow what the two characters did on the shows, so
they do not mess up the world of Pleasantville.  Mary Sue does not abide by
this rule at all.  She tries to live the lifestyle she lived before she was
sucked into this show as best as she can.  She teaches other people what the
real world is like as well.  She is messing up their entire universe.  As the
people start to learn there is an outside of Pleasantville, and they do not
have to be perfect, they start becoming color, along with the surroundings
around them.  There is a huge problem though.  The city council does not like
that the people are becoming color.  The leader (J.T. Walsh) has decided to
call a meeting.  He states he wants the city to stay "pleasant."  
As a result of people becoming color, racial tension is growing.  This is much
like the case between blacks and whites, which is not as strong now, but was
earlier on.  Signs read "No coloreds" and even the owner of the soda shop, Mr.
Johnson (Jeff Daniels), is having his shop torn down by the townspeople because
he is a promoter of color.
The performances in Pleasantville are unbelievably strong.  There are the
outsiders- Reese Witherspoon and Tobey Maguire, who are both very good. 
Witherspoon in particular does a fine job of acting while she has to go through
this terrible nightmare they call "Pleasantville."  Tobey Maguire is enjoyable
as the know it all about Pleasantville.  Then there are the people inside of
Pleasantville- Joan Allen, who is marvelous as she goes through the pain of
becoming color and making hard decisions, William H. Macy, who is very funny
and is much like a person of that era would be, Jeff Daniels, who gives an
emotional performance as he deals with the premise of color, Paul Walker, who
plays Skip Martin, a boy who learns a lot from Reese Witherspoon, and there is
J.T. Walsh who gives a great performance as the man who wants to put an end to
all this color business. 
The art direction in Pleasantville is simply amazing.  The way the color and
black and white people are in the same scenes together, walk by each other, and
change from black and white to color are all very difficult things to do, and I
found this very impressive.  Two scenes especially standed out visually to me. 
1. The scene in which Tobey Maguire applies black and white make up to Joan
Allen to cover up her color.  2. The scene in which Jeff Daniels removes the
make up, revealing color, with a napkin in the soda shop.
The moral story in Pleasantville is a wonderful one.  Many people look at this
film for the special effects, but they do no realize there is a deep meaning to
this film.  If you look deep inside yourself, you will find who you really are
and that you are a very colorful person.  You aren't the same as everyone else.
 The people of Pleasantville realized this and then they became color. 
This film should have been a huge Academy Award winner.  Unfortunately, it was
only nominated for a few, and did not win any of the awards.  If I were in
charge of the Academy, Pleasantville would have been nominated for Best
Picture, Best Supporting Actor- William H. Macy, Best Supporting Actor- Jeff
Daniels, Best Supporting Actress- Joan Allen, Best Supporting Actress- Reese
Witherspoon, Best Director- , Best Dramatic Score (it was nominated), Visual
Effects, Art Direction (it was nominated), Costume Design (it was nominated),
and Best Original Screenplay.  I think the reason it wasn't nominated for many
of these awards is because many people took this movie as a rip off of The
Truman Show. 
The Bottom Line- An inspirational story with flawless performances is quite
pleasant, don't you think?   

Title
Review for Shakespeare in Love (1998)
In the new comedy/drama Shakespeare In Love, you can already tell that it is
going to be excellent.  Judi Dench has been nominated for an Academy Award, Ben
Affleck and Geoffrey Rush have won Academy Awards, and Gwyneth Paltrow is
certainly on her way to at least an Oscar nomination with this film. 
Shakespeare In Love tells the story of William Shakespeare and what inspired
him to write one of the most popular pieces of writing of all time, "Romeo and
Juliet."  It is nice to see a film with a plot revolving around Shakespeare
himself, rather than another one of his pieces of work.  For the first time in
awhile, I have seen a period film that wasn't long and drug out.  Shakespeare
In Love kept my interest and not for one second was my attention directed
somewhere else.
Joseph Finnes plays William Shakespeare, poet and writer in the times of the
1500s.  When Phillip Henslowe, played by Geoffrey Rush, asks Will to write a
play for him so it can be performed, he has a lot of trouble thinking of ideas.
 He believes he has something that many authors get, called writers' block.  He
starts to write a story called "Romeo and Ethel The Pirate's Daughter."  He
only has the title so far, but starts to get ideas when he spots a woman whom
he finds extremely attractive, and he thinks something is very special about
her.  He just stares when he first sees her, and does not make eye contact.  He
writes Act One of his play and it is about the way Romeo felt about a woman he
saw that day.  He meets this lady after a period of time, and discovers that
she is Viola De Lesseps, played by Gwyneth Paltrow.  They get along wonderfully
and start to fall in love.  Viola becomes a fan of Will's work, and desperately
wants to be a part of "Romeo and Ethel The Pirate's Daughter."  Knowing that
girls cannot act in the theater, she dresses up as a boy and rehearses for the
part of Romeo.  She wins the part, but little does she know that Will knows
that she is Viola, not "Thomas Kent", the name she has been going by.
He proceeds anyway, not telling anyone that Viola is actually playing the part
of Romeo in his play.  As Will and Viola fall in love, a problem arises.  Viola
is informed that her duty is to marry Lord Wessex, played by Colin Firth.  She
is devastated that she cannot be with Will any longer.  Queen Elizabeth, played
by Judi Dench, wishes to meet and approve of Viola before she and Lord Wessex
wed.  She doesn't seem to like Viola, and makes a fool of her in front of all
of the people.   Will adds up all the events he goes through with Viola, and
continues writing "Romeo and Ethel The Pirate's Daughter."  Many people,
especially Henslowe are becoming excited about Will's latest script.
Unfortunately, Viola still has to marry Lord Wessex.  Queen Elizabeth informs
Viola that she must move to Virginia with Wessex, and leave Will behind. 
Although she is extremely reluctant to do so, she has to.
Ben Affleck plays Ned, an actor in "Romeo And Ethel The Pirate's Daughter."  He
gives Will the idea of simply calling his story "Romeo and Juliet."  This is
where the classic title comes from.  Will and Viola write more of the story
together, helping each other with ideas.  They come up with the classic ending,
where Romeo and Juliet die together.  The actors continue to work harder and
harder and when show time comes, Will becomes Romeo.  They are ready to perform
this wonderful story, but there is one major problem.  There is no one to play
Juliet.  Viola hears the news and rushes to the stage to play Juliet.  The
performance goes great, and the crowd absolutely loves the show.  A standing
ovation is given, and Will and Viola are extremely happy.  Though many problems
occurred through the writing of "Romeo and Juliet", Viola and Will stayed
together, and really became the characters of Romeo and Juliet.  Everyone in
the town loved the performance, even Queen Elizabeth. 
The cast and characters in Shakespeare In Love had some of the best costumes I
have ever seen in a movie.  The outfits were so real looking, and they didn't
look ridiculous or inaccurate.  The town, the theater, the castle, and all the
other places in the film were extremely real to life and you really felt like
you were there.  Most period movies have a hard time showing what the place
actually looked like.  The theater in particular was impressive.  It didn't
look the least bit new.  You could tell that a lot of time and effort was put
into making Shakespeare In Love look good, sound good, and be good.
The acting in Shakespeare In Love is superb.  Gwyneth Paltrow, Joseph Fiennes,
Judi Dench, Ben Affleck, and Geoffrey Rush should all be nominated for an
Oscar.  Gwyneth Paltrow adds another great  performance to her great year in
the movies.  Joseph Fiennes proves he isn't the only brother capable of being a
great actor.  Judi Dench just proves to us some more that she is a great
actress who can play any roll with great talent.  Ben Affleck shows he can play
more than a hero, or a joker, and that he can do a good job of acting in a
serious roll.  Geoffrey Rush shows us that he is becoming one of the best
actors around.  Shine and Shakespeare In Love are two of my favorite movies
ever, and he was a part of them both.  Shakespeare In Love didn't have many
problems, except for some poorly acted places here and there.  The acting was
the best thing about the movie, and it brought out the best of it.  The plot
was also a great thing.  It is very interesting to see the man behind all these
great pieces of work, instead of his actual work for the hundredth time. 
Overall, Shakespeare In Love is a pure winner.

Title
Review for Playing by Heart (1998)
PLAYING BY HEART by DeWyNGaLe    Rating: A-
Going into this movie, I didn't know anything about it except for the cast
members, and that it was about couples and what they go through.  The only
reason I went to see this movie was because of the large cast, and I am very
glad I did go.  The cast consists of Gena Rowlands, Gillian Anderson, Sean
Connery, Angelina Jolie, Ryan Phillippe, Jon Stewart, Jay Mohr, Anthony
Edwards, Madeline Stowe, Dennis Quaid, and Ellen Burnstyn.  Playing By Heart is
about many couples, and what life is like in the real world.
Gena Rowlands and Sean Connery play Hannah and Paul, a couple that has been
married for forty years.  Paul and Hannah are constantly fighting, and things
aren't really working out between them.  Hannah finds out some secrets that
Paul has kept from her all his life and becomes extremely angered with him. 
Gena Rowlands and Sean Connery do excellent as their characters.  Although they
are extremely undeveloped, you could still get a good feel of how the
characters were.
Angelina Jolie and Ryan Phillippe play Joan and Kennan, two wild and crazy kids
who have been through a lot.  Joan and Kennan both go to dance clubs in their
spare time, and that is where the two first meet.  Ryan and Angelina click on
the big screen.  Keenan has been through a lot through his life, including the
death of the only woman he has ever loved.  Joan also has been through a lot of
heartache in her life as well.  Angelina Jolie gives the best performance of
the large cast, stealing every scene she is in.  With her wild outfits and her
one-eyed cat, and Kennan's blue hair and unique habits, this couple becomes the
most fun to watch.  The two characters get the most screen time, and their
characters are well developed. 
Gillian Anderson and Jon Stewart play another couple.  Gillian Anderson plays
Meredith, a play director, and Jon Stewart plays Trent, an architect.  Meredith
is the type who isn't into dating or anything like it.  She is still upset
about her previous marriage, when she found out her husband was gay.  Trent is
there to try to help her, but she becomes angered even more.  It was
interesting to watch Gillian Anderson on the screen outside of the X-Files
series.  She did a good job of acting, and she should have a successful movie
career.  Jon Stewart does a good job as well, but the performance was somewhat
disappointing.  I think that he was miscast in the role of Trent.
The other two couples are involved in the film are Mildred (Ellen Bunstyn), and
her son, Mark, (Jay Mohr) who has AIDS, and the other couple is Gracie,
(Madeline Stowe) and Roger. (Anthony Edwards) These two couples didn't get much
screen time, and weren't developed very much at all.  The other character in
the film hanging around is Hugh, played by Dennis Quaid.  Quaid gives a funny,
outstanding performance.  Hugh doesn't accomplish much throughout the film,
except for going from bar to bar lying to everyone he can.
Playing By Heart is a realistic movie, not a love fairy tale that couldn't
exist in real life.  The movie was very true to life, and I admired that.  The
ending was also extremely well done.  Endings can be one of the most important
parts of the film, because it is the last impression of the movie you get, and
Playing By Heart's ending certainly was great.  I don't know what it was about
Playing By Heart that got me, but it worked.  It is a very touching story of
what you can go through in life.  It wasn't pure drama though, in fact, there
were many very funny scenes throughout the film.  Willard Carroll, director of
this film, hasn't had many motion picture credits as of yet, but hopefully he
will deliver some more wonderful pieces of work.
The Bottom Line- Playing By Heart has a little something for every age, even
teenagers.        

Title
Review for Hope Floats (1998)
Sandra Bullock was once a great, well-known actress.  For a while, she was one
of the best ones around.  Lately, she hasn't been doing all that well.  The
only movie she has done in awhile is Speed 2: Cruise Control, which was a huge
mistake for her career.  Now, she shapes up with Hope Floats, the story of a
woman and the many problems she goes through.  Harry Connick Jr, Gena Rowlands,
and Mae Whitman co-star as the people closest to Birdee, played by Sandra
Bullock.  Birdee was the most popular girl at her school.  She was prom queen,
everyone looked up to her, and she was truly happy.  A few years after high
school, she got married to a friend from high school, Bill Pruitt, played by
Michael Pare.  On a national talk show, Birdee's best friend Connie, played by
Rosanna Arquette, reveals that she has been having an affair with Bill,
Birdee's husband.  They have been having the affair for over a year.  Bill
wants to marry Connie now.
Birdee and her daughter Bernice, played by Mae Whitman, are extremely saddened.
 They move to Smithville, Texas, where Birdee went to high school.  They go to
live with Birdee's mother, Ramona Calvert, played by Gena Rowlands.  Ramona is
there to help Birdee with her feelings and the problems she is going through. 
It is kind of nice for Birdee to be back in the town that she grew up in.  She
is greeted by many people that she has no idea who they are as she walks along
the streets of Smithville.  She goes to the employment agency to get a job, and
runs into two more people that she knew in high school.  She gets a job as a
worker at a one hour photo store.  She runs into even more people there as they
come in and out of the store to get their pictures developed.  She messes up a
lot of pictures, and she almost loses her job.
Justin Matisse, played by Harry Connick Jr, was very close to Birdee in high
school.  Justin has been helping out Ramona around the house for a number of
years.  Birdee and Justin are reunited at the house.  At first, Birdee is
uncomfortable seeing him, but she gets used to him and they become close
friends once again.  Bernice does not like Justin at all, and is determined to
get back with her real dad.  Bernice is now starting school, and everyone makes
fun of her because of her glasses.  She even gets beaten up.  She is extremely
upset by the whole thing, and wants to go back to leaving with her dad.
Justin and Birdee become closer throughout the movie, and they start to date. 
Ramona hooks them up as good as she can, and she succeeds.  Birdee is still
very upset about the entire episode with Bill, and isn't quite ready to start a
new relationship.  Justin is becoming frustrated with Birdee, because she is
not willing to move on from the man that betrayed her.  She is finally willing
to move on, and for once things are starting to go right in her life.  She is
becoming very happy with Justin, but there is a problem.  Bernice is not very
pleasant any more due to Justin.  She is extremely angry at her mother for the
break up with Bill.  Bernice blames the entire thing on Birdee.  
Hope Floats is a realistic tale of what one can go through throughout their
lives.  Birdee goes through tragedy after tragedy, and finally becomes happy
because she keeps her hopes high.  Sandra Bullock does a great job of acting,
and you could really believe the pain that she was going through.  Gena
Rowlands does an outstanding job as her mother, and deserves on Oscar
nomination for Best Supporting Actress.  Mae Whitman gives a powerful
performance.  She was stuck in a tough spot, and didn't know how to deal with
it.  Harry Connick Jr. is the movie's only problem.  He makes it so it is more
of a fairy tale than a real life experience.  The film is still good with him,
but the role of Justin Matisse could have beem cut down a little bit.  All in
all, hope still floats for Sandra Bullock's career after this film.   

Title
Review for Blast from the Past (1999)
BLAST FROM THE PAST by DeWyNGaLe    Rating: B
Brendan Fraser is the star of this nutty new comedy, which tries to be like the
1997 smash, Austin Powers.  Fraser plays Adam, a boy who has lived underground
with his parents, played by Sissy Spacek and Christopher Walken, all of his
life.  His dad built a world underground in case a nuclear strike were to
occur, and he believes that the strike has occurred and they must go
underground for the next thirty years.  While underground, their son Adam is
born.  He must live in a limited world, not knowing what the sky or other
people looked like.  Now, after a long thirty years, it is time for Adam to see
the world.
The scenes underground with Adam's parents are very nicely done and are
absolutely hysterical.  Unfortunately, they don't last for long, and Spacek and
Walken's performances are extremely limited.  Unlike Austin Powers, Adam has
never been out in the real world before, so it will be a total surprise to him.
 Before setting foot in the real world, he makes a wish that he could meet a
girl.  His wish is about to come true.  When Adam was finally able to come out
of the underground cell, the movie goes downhill.  Once Adam comes above
ground, Alicia Silverstone is the only thing saving the film from completely
collapsing.  A corny plot line withing the plot is the shop above where the
cell has been built.  When the workers in the shop above see Adam, they think
he is from a different race, which I thought could have been cut from the film
entirely.  To make some money, Adam decides to sell some of his father's
baseball cards.  At the baseball card shop he meets Eve, played by Alicia
Silverstone.  She is very confused about the ignorance of Adam.
Following the tradition of romantic comedies, Adam and Eve fall in love and
then when everything is going just right, something bad happens.  Luckily in
Blast From The Past, there are a few more twists to make the same old plot line
a little more fun to watch.  Spacek and Walken as the parents were the best
part of the film, and the stole the show.  Silverstone gives a lot better
performance than in her latest films, but she doesn't surpass her outstanding,
one of a kind performance in Clueless.  Fraser's character of Adam is a little
overdone, and quite annoying at times.  He is still a pretty likable character
though.
The relationship between Adam and Eve doesn't go anywhere, and it doesn't seem
like the two characters bond well.  As Eve takes Adam out to more and more
places, he becomes interested in more things, including other girls.  Eve is
very disappointed, but she won't give up Adam.  After Adam tells her the story
about how he lives underground, she thinks he is crazy and she tries to admit
him to the mental institution.  This is probably the most humorous part of the
film.  A very predictable ending occurrs, which is very disappointing to me. 
It would be nice for once for a film to have a funny, surprising ending, but
Blast From The Past disappoints me once again.
The scenes in Blast From The Past are a little humorous, but nothing more than
that.  That's pretty much how the whole film is.  It isn't great or a classic,
but it isn't meant to be.  It is a feel good, enjoyable movie that is fun to
watch.  It could have been taken further, to a higher level of comedy.  The key
to that would have been to add more scenes with Spacek and Walken.
The Bottom Line- Just your average romantic comedy.

Title
Review for Virus (1999)
On August 14th, 1998, Virus was supposed to be released.  Six months later it
was finally released in theaters.  I hoped in this six months time, they
improved the quality of the movie, but unfortunately, I wasn't impressed.  The
cast is great, the plot is original, and the setting isn't really all that bad.
 If a little more effort and time was put into Virus, it really could have been
good.  It may be another action flick on a boat, but it isn't the worst of
them.  William Baldwin, Jamie Lee Curtis, and Donald Sutherland star.  When a
mysterious force takes over a satellite in space, everything is killed.  It
travels through the computers, controlling them.  The remains of the satellite
plummet into a ship directly below it on earth.  The ship is wiped out by this
"virus", as it travels along.
An American ship containing a crew of researchers finds this ship.  The crew
contains Steve, played by William Baldwin, Foster, played by Jamie Lee Curtis,
Captain Everton, played by Donald Sutherland, Richie, played by Sherman
Augustus, Woods, played by Marshall Bell, Hiko, played by Cliff Curits, and
Squeaky, played by Julio Oscar Mechoso.  Their boat is sinking, so they must
board the Russian ship that they see.  They board the ship and find everything
to be destroyed.  They become scared when they find blood covering the walls. 
Strange things start going on on the ship.  Little robot creatures that walk
are abducting the cast one by one.  The critters use their bodies to walk and
talk and kill.  The survivors find out that the aliens are trying to start a
new species on earth, and they need humans and electricity to operate.  They
want to take over earth. 
The crew goes through a lot to try to stop this form of life.  They find a
survivor from when the ship was taken over by the life form.  Her name is
Nadia, played by Joanna Pacula.  She explains to the crew what is going on and
how all this came to be.  She explains the life form to them and tells them
what happened when the species took over the ship.  She is much help to them,
and she tries her best to tell them what is going on.  They must sink the ship
to get rid of them all.  They plan on detonating the ship to sink it, but the
aliens discover the plan and destroy the detonator.  More twists and turns
arise, but Virus pretty much sticks on one thing for way too long.  Not many
things go on during Virus, which makes it boring to watch.
The thing that kept Virus from becoming good was the acting.  William Baldwin
and Donald Sutherland do pathetic jobs of acting.  The acting was fake, and you
could tell they were acting.  You couldn't believe their roles at all.  They
didn't let you feel the terror that they were going through unlike Jamie Lee
Curtis did.  Sherman Augustus also did a good job of acting.  Richie was the
only character that I cared lived or not.  Most of the characters are
underdeveloped and unlikable.  Another thing that was bad about Virus was the
fact that it was extremely predictable.  I could tell what was going to happen
at every moment.
It may sound like I hated Virus, but there was a bright side.  The concept was
very good, and it could have gone a long way with a better cast.  The special
effects were great.  They looked very realistic, and it seemed like they
weren't even produced by computers.  The aliens look very realistic and creepy.
 Some of the concepts may be extremely unoriginal, but all in all the alien
concept was pretty good.  Virus could have been great, but it turned out to be
another pointless horror/sci-fi movie.
The Bottom Line- Special effects aren't everything.   

Title
Review for 54 (1998)
Ryan Phillippe, Neve Campbell, Mike Myers, Breckin Meyer, and Selma Hayek star
in this drama about the nightclub called 54.  54 is a nightclub that existed in
the 70s and 80s in Brooklyn, New York.  This film tells the story of a man's
dream of becoming a star, and how he made it to the top.  Ryan Phillippe stars
as Shane O'Shea, a city kid.  He and his buddies always hang out on the
weekends, and don't have much to do.  Shane always wonders what is on the other
side of the bridge, in Brooklyn.  One night he decides to go there with a few
buddies.  He sees the club of Studio 54.  He has heard all about it in the news
and papers.  Many stars go there, people he admires.  The only problem is, you
are only allowed in if you are on the list, or you are good looking enough to
enter.  
Mike Myers plays Steve Rubell, owner of Studio 54.  He has it made.  He is
pulling in a ton of money from 54.  He is the one who makes the list of the
people allowed in, and he is also the judge of who is good looking enough to
enter.  On the night that Shane comes, he allows Shane in, but he does not
allow his friends to come in.  Shane feels guilty, but enters anyway.  He is
about to have the time of his life.  He enters 54, and sees all the glitz and
glamour.  People are dancing, music is playing, and everyone is happy.  It is
like a dream come true.  He is now placed on the list, so he is allowed in at
anytime.  As he comes back more and more, Steve offers him a job as a
bartender.  He meets Greg (Breckin Meyer) and his wife Anita. (Selma Hayek) As
the movie progresses, the three of them become great friends.
One night at 54, Shane spots his dream girl, Julie Black. (Neve Campbell) Julie
is a soap star who is extremely popular.  He has always wanted to meet her and
now is his chance.  He talks with her, and they seem to get along.  As the
movie goes, Julie and Shane meet some more and get together.  They become
boyfriend and girlfriend after meeting the day after Chirstmas.  The
relationship between Shane and Julie was way underdeveloped and not told very
well at all.  Neve Campbell gives a fair performance in her short, ten minute
roll.  She could have been shown a lot more, and her character could have been
developed.
Greg and Anita's marriage is having many problems.  Greg thinks that Anita and
Shane are having an affair, which they are not.  Anita's dream is to be a
singer.  She wants to sing at 54 in front of everyone, and she finally gets the
opportunity at a New Year's Eve party.  Everyone likes her performance, and
Greg is very proud.  Greg and Anita eventually work everything out, including
their friendship with Shane.
Steve keeps bumping Shane up in the ranks at 54.  Shane is making a lot of
money now, and he is modeling for magazines.  Steve is proud to have Shane at
54.  Greg is becoming quite jealous, and their friendship is becoming
jeopardized.  Shane is still close to his family at home, but he is mostly in
the city now.  He is starting to become unhappy with his life and what he is
doing.  The only thing he has is the title "Shane 54" and a whole lot of money.
 Now, Steve is in a lot of trouble with the law.  He is losing money, and they
are ordering for 54 to be shut down.  Once it is shut down, everything is back
to normal.  Shane is still a big star, rich and famous.  Anita and Greg stay
together and remain friends with Shane.  A few years later, they re-open 54 for
a couple of years.  Everyone is there for the reunion, including Shane.  Shane
simply smiles at Steve, not speaking a word to him.  54 is not all that it used
to be, and a few years later 54 would shut down once again.
54 is an over dramatic tale of the rise and fall of a boy with a dream.  It had
a lot of potential to be a great film, but failed.  The plot is not strong at
all, and a lot of things aren't explained in the film.  Ryan Phillippe over
acts throughout the entire movie.  Mike Myers deserves an Oscar nod for his
role as the owner of 54.  Breckin Myer, Neve Campbell, and Selma Hayek all give
mediocre performances in their underdeveloped roles.  If they had not cut out
so many scenes, and added about twenty more minutes of footage, 54 could have
been a real winner.

Title
Review for Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace (1999)
STAR WARS EPISODE I: THE PHANTOM MENACE 
by DeWyNGaLe (John Sylva)    Rating: A+
http://members.aol.com/DeWyNGaLe
There is only one word in the English language that can describe my feelings
right now.  That word is "Woah!"  Star Wars Episode 1: The Phantom Menace,
which is the most anticipated movie of the century, was released into theaters
this week.  Many early reviews have trashed The Phantom Menace, accusing it of
not developing characters, and stating many other negative aspects of the film.
 How could you dare trash this amazing masterpiece?  Many reviewers have
reviewed the film in comparison to the other three Star Wars films that were
released from 1977-1983, but not the actual film itself.  Well, here's a review
of the film itself, and I hope it's what you are looking for.
The Phantom Menace takes place a few decades before the events in Star Wars
Episode IV: A New Hope occurred.  In The Phantom Menace, we are introduced to
two Jedi, Qui-Gon Jinn (Liam Neeson), who is a newcomer to the Star Wars
series, and Ben Obi-Wan Kenobi (Ewan McGregor), who is depicted in Episodes IV,
V, and VI by Sir Alec Guinness.  The two Jedi are off to save the innocent
planet of Naboo from the evil forces of the Trade Federation, which is
threatening to take over the planet.  Upon their arrival at Naboo, they come
across a creature of the species "Gungan", named Jar Jar Binks (Ahmed Best),
who they have tag along for their adventures to serve as a guide to them.  The
two came to Naboo to hopefully rescue the 14-year old Queen Amidala (Natalie
Portman) from the planet before it is too late to save her life.  Knowing that
the Trade Federation isn't in existence on the remote planet of Tatooine (sound
familiar from Episode IV?), they take her there to hide her, and on their
journey, discover a young child named Anakin Skywalker (Jake Lloyd) who they
believe has the force strong inside of him.  Also discovered at Tatooine is a
new Sith, Darth Maul, played by Ray Park.  Qui-Gon and Obi-Wan realize that he
has Jedi training and could be a huge threat to themselves, as well as the
worried Queen Amidala.
Above is a basic plot outline of The Phantom Menace, but there are many more
details to each one of the plot, which all tie into Episodes IV, V, and VI. 
One of these major plots is the fact that Anakin Skywalker is actually a young
Darth Vader, and if you have seen Episode VI: Return of the Jedi, you know so. 
The Phantom Menace ties in with Episodes IV, V, and VI in every way.  It was
amazing how George Lucas enabled everything to fit together so nicely, making
it seem as if this film was released before the other three Episodes.
The acting in The Phantom Menace isn't what I would call the best acting in a
movie ever, but it certainly added much content to the film.  Liam Neeson and
Natalie Portman in particular stood out from the cast, making every line that
came out of their mouths believable and realistic.  Ewan McGregor, who I think
should have been used more in the film, turned out the best performance of his
career in the time that he was present on screen.  Many reviewers are also
trashing Jake Lloyd's simple but effective performance as the young Anakin
Skywalker.  Remember folks, he is supposed to be nine years old, so most likely
his acting performance will be very immature and childish.  Considering Jake
Lloyd was supposed to be playing a nine year old, he did a great job.  Ahmed
Best, who brilliantly voices the cute, realistic, and hysterical Jar Jar Binks,
was sometimes hard to understand, but added much comic relief to the film.
Although I have stated some characters were underused, I am not saying it took
away from the film at all.  The point of Episode 1 was to build a bridge to the
next two Episodes, and that it did.  Sure, I would have loved to have seen
Darth Maul for more than ten minutes, or some more of Samuel L. Jackson's
character of Mace Windu, but nothing was taken away from the overall effect of
the film.
Where do I even start about the marvelous special effects?  I guess I will just
put it plain and simple- The Phantom Menace contains the best special effects
you will ever see in a film.  The armies of battle droids, the ships flying
through the air, and the amazing podrace sequence soar above any special effect
that I have ever seen used in a film.  Those who were wondering if The Phantom
Menace would have better special effects than The Matrix have now had their
questions answered.  The special effects in the lightsaber battle scenes are
extraordinary.  The choreography during these sequences is much better and are
much more exciting than the lightsaber battles in Episodes IV, V, and VI.
The use of sound in The Phantom Menace is overwhelming.  I can certainly award
The Phantom Menace with the loudest movie I have ever seen.  Don't get me
wrong, the sound is not loud and obnoxious, and it is loud when it should be
loud, and quiet when it should be quiet.  The sound of podracers and ships
speeding through space were the most effective of the many different sound
effects in the film.
Costume design and makeup both added quite a bit to the film as well.  As you
can probably tell, Queen Amidala makes up the majority of each one of these
categories.  Her outfits are so original, creative, and fun, it is amazing. 
Others, such as the eerie Darth Maul, or Senator Palpatine (later to become the
dreaded Emperor Palpatine seen in Return of the Jedi), all of the outfits for
each and every character are stunningly original.
What George Lucas has done with The Phantom Menace is simply genius.  How many
filmmakers would be willing to do a prequel to the biggest movie saga of all
time with little known actors, sixteen years after the last one has been
released?  I can only think of one, and that would be George Lucas.  The
Phantom Menace is done with style, and I mean George Lucas style.  It follows
pretty much the same feel, despite what others say, that Episodes IV, V, and VI
followed.  Although comparing the film to others is not any part of my rating,
The Phantom Menace soars above all three of the other Star Wars films.  In
almost every way, The Phantom Menace stood out.  I would say it is most like
1983's Return of the Jedi, which used to be my favorite of the Star Wars bunch,
but has now been replaced with this brilliant piece of work, Star Wars Episode
I: The Phantom Menace.
The Bottom Line- Argue with me all you want to, but I think I just found the
best movie of all time.  

Title
Review for I Know What You Did Last Summer (1997)
I Know What You Did Last Summer was a mystery written by Lois Duncan in the
seventies.  It was about four kids who hit a boy in the middle of the street
and now someone knows and comes to make sure they have paid for what they have
done.  The movie adaption is pretty much the same, only it is a grown man in
the middle of the street and the plot is a little more complicated.  They are
spoilers though, so I won't reveal them.
Helen Shivers (Sarah Michelle Gellar) is competing for the beauty pageant at
the 4th of July parade in Southport, South Carolina.  Her friends, Julie James
(Jennifer Love Hewitt), Ray Bronson (Freddie Prinze Jr.), and Barry Cox (Ryan
Phillippe).  She wins, of course, and then the four of them go to celebrate on
Dawson's Beach.  On the way back, Ray runs into something.  The four of them
get out of the car and look down the road, revealing a dead body.  They take
him to a fishing place, where they can put his body in the water and no one
will find out about what happened that summer.  They make a pact to never tell
anyone what went on that year.  No one every did, either.  Then how come
someone knows?
In the past year, Julie James's life has been terrible.  She feels awful for
what she has done and doesn't want to tell anyone, in fear.  Her grades have
slipped, her relationship with her mother has vanished, and she is losing
friends.  One year after the incident on the road, she gets a letter.  In bold
black print it reads Julie James, followed by her address.  She opens the
letter to a small slip of paper reading I KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER.  Julie
is terrified.  They were so careful, weren't they?  Who could know?
She takes the letter to Ray, Helen, and Barry to show them what has gone on. 
Now, the terror is happening to all four of them.  Barry gets run over.  Julie
gets a body in a truck.  Helen gets her hair chopped off.  Ray gets another
letter.  Pretty freaky, huh?  Now, they are seeing the killer.  He wears a
fisherman's coat, with a hat so you cannot see his/her face.  They go to David
Egan's (the man they ran over) house in hopes they could find out some
information.  All they find is the suspicious Missy Egan. (played terrifically
by Anne Heche)  They suspect it is someone named Billy Blue, a man that Missy
named stopped by the house shortly after David died.  After some more twists
and sightings, the climax comes when the fisherman is ready to kill all four of
them with his long, sharp fishing hook.
I Know What You Did Last Summer was written by Kevin Williamson, and if it
weren't for him, this movie probably wouldn't have been as good.  Jennifer Love
Hewitt proves herself to be a good actress, as well as the rest of the cast. 
Sarah Michelle Gellar shows us she can do more than be a mean daughter on a
soap opera.  Ryan Phillippe shows us that he can act great.  Overall, the movie
is wonderful, although a few elements are difficult to understand.  This movie
and the second Scream are sitting on top of the world.  For now, anyway. 
Perhaps another great movie will come and bump this one off.  But, considering
how eerie and scary it is, it is almost impossible.

Title
Review for 54 (1998)
Ryan Phillippe, Neve Campbell, Mike Myers, Breckin Meyer, and Selma Hayek star
in this drama about the nightclub called 54.  54 is a nightclub that existed in
the 70s and 80s in Brooklyn, New York.  This film tells the story of a man's
dream of becoming a star, and how he made it to the top.  Ryan Phillippe stars
as Shane O'Shea, a city kid.  He and his buddies always hang out on the
weekends, and don't have much to do.  Shane always wonders what is on the other
side of the bridge, in Brooklyn.  One night he decides to go there with a few
buddies.  He sees the club of Studio 54.  He has heard all about it in the news
and papers.  Many stars go there, people he admires.  The only problem is, you
are only allowed in if you are on the list, or you are good looking enough to
enter.  
Mike Myers plays Steve Rubell, owner of Studio 54.  He has it made.  He is
pulling in a ton of money from 54.  He is the one who makes the list of the
people allowed in, and he is also the judge of who is good looking enough to
enter.  On the night that Shane comes, he allows Shane in, but he does not
allow his friends to come in.  Shane feels guilty, but enters anyway.  He is
about to have the time of his life.  He enters 54, and sees all the glitz and
glamour.  People are dancing, music is playing, and everyone is happy.  It is
like a dream come true.  He is now placed on the list, so he is allowed in at
anytime.  As he comes back more and more, Steve offers him a job as a
bartender.  He meets Greg (Breckin Meyer) and his wife Anita. (Selma Hayek) As
the movie progresses, the three of them become great friends.
One night at 54, Shane spots his dream girl, Julie Black. (Neve Campbell) Julie
is a soap star who is extremely popular.  He has always wanted to meet her and
now is his chance.  He talks with her, and they seem to get along.  As the
movie goes, Julie and Shane meet some more and get together.  They become
boyfriend and girlfriend after meeting the day after Chirstmas.  The
relationship between Shane and Julie was way underdeveloped and not told very
well at all.  Neve Campbell gives a fair performance in her short, ten minute
roll.  She could have been shown a lot more, and her character could have been
developed.
Greg and Anita's marriage is having many problems.  Greg thinks that Anita and
Shane are having an affair, which they are not.  Anita's dream is to be a
singer.  She wants to sing at 54 in front of everyone, and she finally gets the
opportunity at a New Year's Eve party.  Everyone likes her performance, and
Greg is very proud.  Greg and Anita eventually work everything out, including
their friendship with Shane.
Steve keeps bumping Shane up in the ranks at 54.  Shane is making a lot of
money now, and he is modeling for magazines.  Steve is proud to have Shane at
54.  Greg is becoming quite jealous, and their friendship is becoming
jeopardized.  Shane is still close to his family at home, but he is mostly in
the city now.  He is starting to become unhappy with his life and what he is
doing.  The only thing he has is the title "Shane 54" and a whole lot of money.
 Now, Steve is in a lot of trouble with the law.  He is losing money, and they
are ordering for 54 to be shut down.  Once it is shut down, everything is back
to normal.  Shane is still a big star, rich and famous.  Anita and Greg stay
together and remain friends with Shane.  A few years later, they re-open 54 for
a couple of years.  Everyone is there for the reunion, including Shane.  Shane
simply smiles at Steve, not speaking a word to him.  54 is not all that it used
to be, and a few years later 54 would shut down once again.
54 is an over dramatic tale of the rise and fall of a boy with a dream.  It had
a lot of potential to be a great film, but failed.  The plot is not strong at
all, and a lot of things aren't explained in the film.  Ryan Phillippe over
acts throughout the entire movie.  Mike Myers deserves an Oscar nod for his
role as the owner of 54.  Breckin Myer, Neve Campbell, and Selma Hayek all give
mediocre performances in their underdeveloped roles.  If they had not cut out
so many scenes, and added about twenty more minutes of footage, 54 could have
been a real winner.

Title
Review for Thirteenth Floor, The (1999)
THE THIRTEENTH FLOOR by DeWyNGaLe    Rating: B
The Thirteenth Floor, the third in what I would call "the reality check movie
series", is very similar to the other reality check movies released this year,
The Matrix and eXistenZ.  All three made you think, made you wonder what is
real, what isn't, and if our world is just a huge game.  The Thirteenth Floor
doesn't reach the level of originality, creativity, and curiosity sparked by
The Matrix and eXistenZ, but it certainly gives a great shot at it.  In The
Matrix, we were told that the humans are simply a virus.  In eXistenZ, we
learned that our life could be just a game.  In The Thirteenth Floor, we learn
that we are just electronic devices, living under another world of electronic
devices.  There is just one world on top of another, and everything in them are
fake and electronically generated.
The Thirteenth Floor took a huge, risky turn that I didn't expect it to take,
and I'm not very sure it was such a great turn to make.  Rather than focusing
just on the reality parts of the film, The Thirteenth Floor becomes a murder
mystery that ends up tying in with the different worlds.  After the mysterious
murder of computer program designer Hammond Fuller, played by Armin
Mueller-Stahl, Douglas Hall, played by Craig Bierko, a man that worked under
Fuller for many years, must travel through an electronic computer device that
Fuller was using, to the year 1937, which consists of computer generated
characters only.  The simulation of 1937 is just like it was back in the olden
days.  All of the people involved are just characters, or are they?  Douglas
strongly believes that a character traveled through the transport from their
world to ours, and killed Fuller.  Along the way, Douglas interacts with many
different potential suspects, and a woman who claims to be the daughter of
Fuller, Jane Fuller, played wonderfully by a talented young actress, Gretchen
Mol.
The Thirteenth Floor is a plot driven movie from the time the film gets going,
and doesn't use spectacular special effects and big sound to keep the viewer's
interests.  I was worried that this film would be too much like The Matrix and
eXistenZ, and I wouldn't enjoy it, but there were enough twists and turns to
keep me thinking and attentive to the film.  Unfortunately, many potential
would have been great scenes were thrown away with predictable content, letting
the viewer know the outcome of the scene long before it happened.  The scenes
that aren't original or interesting seem to go absolutely nowhere, leaving you
wondering, " What is the point of this?"  
Sometimes it was hard to believe that this story, with terrible dialogue, some
bad acting, especially from Craig Bierko, and scenes that go absolutely
nowhere, are actually true.  I know this isn't a true story or anything, but a
film should be able to make you think that it is.  On the plus side of acting,
we get to see the missing from main character action since the film masterpiece
Shine in 1995 actor, Armin Mueller-Stahl. In The Thirteenth Floor, he is back
and is still giving believable and amazing performances.  Another plus is
Gretchen Mol's realistic performance, creating her character with depth, not
just staying in the one-dimensional phase.
Don't expect the intensity of The Matrix or eXistenZ to come out of The
Thirteenth Floor, just expect another film that messes with your mind for
awhile, and shuts you down like any other movie would.  Thrills, chills, and
spills aren't what you will get in this film, but you will just get another
trip to send your mind on, scrambling it until you've had enough.  
The Bottom Line- Let's hope this is the last of the "reality check" based
movies for awhile.

Title
Review for Cookie's Fortune (1999)
COOKIE'S FORTUNE by DeWyNGaLe    Rating: A-
http://members.aol.com/DeWyNGaLe
Lately, I have seen a similar plot in three movies.  In Jawbreaker (D), Dead
Man on Campus (C), and The Curve (A-).  In all three films, the characters are
trying to cover up a murder to make it look like suicide.  In Cookie's Fortune,
I got a little break from the repetitive plot.  Instead of making the murder
look like suicide, the goal is to make the suicide look like murder.  Cookie's
Fortune comes from legendary director Robert Altman.  Unfortunately, I have
only been able to see one of his either films, The Gingerbread Man (C+), but he
is also the director of Academy Award hits M*A*S*H (1970) and Nashville (1975).
Cookie, played by Patricia Neal, is an elderly widow who is very lonely.  She
is kept company by Willis, played by Charles Dutton.  We are also introduced to
two nieces of Cookie's, Camille, played by Glenn Close, who is desperately
trying to organize her Easter play, and Cora, played by Julianne Moore, who is
the star of the play.  When Cookie commits suicide and her body is discovered
by Camille, Camille is desperate to cover it up to make it look like murder. 
She thinks that it is a disgrace for people in her family to commit suicide. 
She destroys all evidence of it looking like a suicide, including eating the
suicide note she left to Willis.  Now, the police must solve the case of who
killed Cookie.  Everyone related to Cookie in any way is a suspect.  Willis
becomes the prime suspect, even though it is the last thing in the world he
would do.
There is an abundance of great subplots in Cookie's Fortune, which make this
movie mostly about the characters.  Sure there is the main plot dealing with
Cookie, but there is also the subplot of Willis becoming a suspect, Cookie's
great niece Emma, played by Liv Tyler, and her relationship with Jason, a
police officer played by Chris O'Donnell, the play that Camille is putting on,
and many, many more.  At times there are too many, and I wish some of them
could have been developed a bit more.
Cookie's Fortune is much like the 1997 film Playing by Heart.  It follows
different characters with different stories behind each one of them, and it
relates them all with each other.  Both of them are both realistic films, but
Cookie's Fortune dealt with human emotion a little better.  Charles Dutton in
particular turned out a very emotional performance as he has to suffer through
the hardships of losing one so close to him.  The other thing that I liked
better in this film than in Playing by Heart was that it really went somewhere,
and it didn't just lead up to one small scene.
The performances in Cookie's Fortune are wonderful.  Glenn Close leads the
large cast, and she did a good job of it.  Her character was funny, yet very
unlikable.  Patricia Neal, in her smaller role as Aunt Cookie, is very good. 
Her character is a very, very realistic one.  Julianne Moore is hilarious.  Her
character is completely clueless as to what is going on around her.  I'm really
glad to see Liv Tyler in a great film again.  She just gave me another reason
in this film to make me think she is one of today's best actresses.  There are
also some underdeveloped characters in the film, played by Ned Beatty and Lyle
Lovett.  
Cookie's Fortune was a comeback movie of sorts, especially for Chris O'Donnell,
who last appeared in the 1997 film Batman and Robin.  Batman and Robin was
trashed by critics, and then O'Donnell disappeared for a while.  In Cookie's
Fortune, he was great, and now people shouldn't look back on his performance in
Batman and Robin anymore.  Julianne Moore, who last appeared in the re-make
Psycho, was much better in Cookie's Fortune than in Psycho.  Also making a
comeback in Cookie's Fortune is Liv Tyler, who played Grace in the 1998 box
office smash, but the critically trashed film Armageddon.  In Cookie's Fortune,
Liv is able to go places that she wasn't able to in Armageddon or any of her
other movies, such as That Thing You Do! (A+) or Empire Records (A-.) 
It was great to see a mixture of comedy, black comedy, drama, and mystery all
in one film.  I would most likely classify this film as a black comedy, but
nothing as dark as the terrible Very Bad Things (D-).  All of the different
genres in one worked really well.  Each one of them stood out in different
characters and different times.  There are the funny parts which made me laugh,
but there are also the sad, sad scenes, especially involving Cookie.  Luckily,
all of the different elements did level out to equal one fun, great film.
The Bottom Line- This cookie is worth a fortune.

Title
Review for Analyze This (1999)
For years, Robert DeNiro has played mob bosses in some of my favorite
films of all time.  Now, in Analyze This, he is playing the same role,
in a very different way.  DeNiro plays Paul Vitti, a mob boss with a
problem.  His emotions bring him down.  He suffers anxiety attacks,
one after another.  Whenever he kills someone, let alone hurt their
feelings, he breaks down.  He cannot stand to watch people be upset or
suffer.  Worrying about his health, he sees a doctor to learn nothing
is wrong with his heart.  DeNiro decides he is going to see a
psychiatrist to help him with his problems.  The psychiatrist he sees
is Ben, played by Billy Crystal.  Ben is very scared to have Paul
Vitti as a patient, considering Paul is one of the most feared and
famous mob bosses in world.  Ben is getting ready to be wed to Laura,
played by the hilarious Lisa Kudrow.
Seeing Ben, Paul gains a lot from very little.  It doesn't take much
to please Paul at all.  Some very funny sequences occur when Ben and
Paul are talking about Paul's problem.  Ben is trying very hard to get
to the core of the problem with Ben.  He thinks that it has a lot to
do with the death of his dad, who was also a famed mob boss.  As Paul
and Ben see each other more and more, Paul needs Ben more and more.
Paul will hunt down Ben anytime of the day, anywhere, including Ben's
wedding, to find him and get help with the emotions he is feeling at
that moment.
Robert DeNiro's talent has gone to waste in this film.  DeNiro is one
of today's best actors, and his performances are always top notch.  It
was in Analyze This as well, but unfortunately, he wasn't given a
whole lot to work with.  Robert DeNiro needs to choose his films more
wisely, and not take part in films that are going to waste him.  Billy
Crystal is really in a slump.  In his past few films, he has been
horrible.  In Analyze This, he isn't bad, but he certainly isn't back
to where he used to be.  His talent was also wasted in the film.
Lisa Kudrow's talent was also totally wasted in the movie.  She was
hardly in the film at all, and when she was she didn't get any funny
lines.  Kudrow has a lot of potential as a hysterical person, and she
will have a wonderful career, but they should have brought her into
the movie a lot more.  At her wedding, when she explodes at Paul for a
death at the wedding, she gives the type of performance from her I
like to see.  She seemed like her character Michele, in her best film
to date, Romy And Michele's High School Reunion.  This is the only
sequence with Kudrow that works, and unfortunately, it wasn't very
long.
It was a disappointment that all three of the lead actor's talent went
to waste.  The concept for the film was good, the cast was there, and
a lot of potential was there.  All of the requirements for a laugh
riot were there, but the characters were not written well enough or
interestingly enough to succeed.
Don't get me wrong, Analyze This wasn't bad, it's just that it wasn't
worked to it's potential, and when that happens with a film, I do not
think highly of it.  If the stars were different, and they weren't as
superb as the actors who did star in it, I would have probably thought
more of the film because I knew that they worked to their potential.
The movie was a good one, not bad, it was just disappointing.  Before
viewing the film, I thought it would be hilarious.  It turns out that
the cast doesn't mean a thing in films these days.
The Bottom Line- Such a great cast.  Such a huge disappointment.

Title
Review for Blair Witch Project, The (1999)
THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT by DeWyNGaLe    Rating: B
http://members.aol.com/DeWyNGaLe
Legends are something that are extremely popular to tell these days.  As we
learned in 1998's Urban Legend (A), there are many legends which may come true
and there are some that are just legends.  The Blair Witch Project is another
movie about a legend, and if it is true, these three kids could be in a lot of
trouble.  At the beginning of the film, we learn that three students
disappeared while making a documentary film in 1994.  One year later, their
footage was found.  Obviously, they did run into trouble while making their
documentary.
The film is setup to look like it is real, so therefore the character's names
are the same as the actor's names.  Heather Donahue, Michael Williams, and
Joshua Leonard are the three students we learned about on the title card.  The
three are making a documentary about "The Blair witch", a witch that supposedly
roams the woods of Burkittsville, Maryland.  The entire film is the footage
that the three shot out in the woods while trying to complete the documentary. 
The footage explains the disappearance of the three and what lead up to a very
scary story.
The Blair Witch Project is filmed in a very interesting way.  The entire movie
is filmed through a hand-held camera, to add to the feel of this being a true
story.  (Which, by the way, it isn't.)  Sometimes the camera isn't very clear
and we, "the viewers" cannot tell what is being shown.  The filming through the
hand-held camera adds to the scariness of the film, especially at night when it
is hard to tell what is going on, and you must rely on sound to let you know
what is happening.
It was very hard for me to rate The Blair Witch Project.  After the film was
over, I was left very confused, and I couldn't unscramble what I thought of it.
 Still, I am uncertain if B' is what I want to give this film.  I am split
fifty-fifty on this film.  As I think about the film more and more, I like it
more and more.  Then there is another part of me that says the film could have
been much, much better.    
During the film, I was scared to death.  The first half didn't scare me, but in
the last thirty or forty minutes, it really picked up and completely blew me
away.  The fear was only there during the film though, and afterwards I didn't
feel scared or worried about what happened in the film.  The thing that added
to the scariness the most was the simplicity of it.  This just proves you don't
need special effects or blood to make a movie scary.  It isn't all scares in
The Blair Witch Project.  There are a lot of laughs too, especially during
interviews the three conducted on townspeople about the Blair witch.  It is
also very saddening.  If it wasn't so real to life, it wouldn't be as sad, but
the film did seem like real life. 
I must say that this film is the most realistic film I have ever seen in my
life.  The performances add to that statement very much.  Heather, the main
character, in particular did an outstanding job of acting.  It did not feel
like she was acting at all.  I hope that the Academy thinks of her next year
when they come up with their nominations.  Michael Williams and Joshua Leonard
are both great in the film as well, it just so happens we don't see them as
much as Heather.
All in all, The Blair Witch Project was a good film.  The actors were all first
time actors, and the director was a first time director as well.  Considering
that and the low budget, it is extraordinary.  It was nice to get away from the
slasher genre and go into the psychological genre of movie, but the film didn't
use its potential to its fullest.  If they had added about twenty minutes of
more scary footage, this could have been one of the best films ever.
The Bottom Line- This project is incomplete.

Title
Review for 10 Things I Hate About You (1999)
TEN THINGS I HATE ABOUT YOU by DeWyNGaLe    Rating: C+
http://members.aol.com/DeWyNGaLe
Lately, Shakespeare has been the subject of many movies, including the winner
of the Academy Award for the Best Picture of 1998, Shakespeare In Love. 
Throughout 1999, moviegoers will also be able to experience William
Shakespeare's A Midsummer Night's Dreams and Hamlet.  Ten Things I Hate About
You is the adaption of the Shakespeare piece, "The Taming of The Shrew."  The
plot of Ten Things I Hate About You revolves around the Stratford sisters, two
students who attend Padua High that despise each other.  First, there is Bianca
Stratford, played by Larisa Oleynik, a popular, self centered person who
doesn't care about others.  Then, there is Bianca's sister named Kat, played by
Julia Stiles.  Kat is very disrespected at her school.  According to Bianca, at
one time Kat was popular, but because sick of the popularity.  Now, Kat is very
anti-social, mainly because she doesn't want to go with what everyone wants her
to do.
At Padua High, there is a new face around school.  His name is Cameron, played
by 3rd Rock From the Sun and Halloween H20's Joseph Gordon-Levitt.  His eye is
immediately caught by Bianca Stratford, and now he is desperate to win her
love.  Cameron is immediately facing a problem.  Joey, played by Andrew Keegan,
is a very popular jock at Padua High.  He also likes Bianca, so Cameron must
get to her first.  Now, Joey and Cameron are facing another problem.  Bianca is
not allowed to date because of the rule made by her father, played by Larry
Miller.  With the prom coming up, Bianca desperately wants to be able to date. 
Her father makes up a new rule.  If Kat dates, Bianca can date.  The rule
sounds extremely unfair to Bianca, considering Kat doesn't even want to date. 
Cameron and Joey must find someone to take out Kat, so Bianca can date. 
Patrick, played by Heath Ledger, seems to be the right one to take out Kat.  He
is bribed to take Kat out, and then the film goes into very predicable
sequences which I feel like I have watched over and over again.
TEN THINGS I LIKED ABOUT THIS MOVIE
1. Julia Stiles's wonderful acting performance.  Julia was very realistic and
believable as a teen.  She has a bright future.
2. Larisa Oleynik's performance as Bianca.  She was also very realistic as a
teenager.  Her character is much like many kids at my own school.
3. The way that it got its ideas from Shakespeare.
4. There are a number of funny sequences.
5. The soundtrack is fast and fun.  It adds to the feel of the movie.
6. Heath Ledger's character was a pretty likable, fun character.  
7. The way Bianca realized that she is selfish and she should be different than
that.
8. The way the parent doesn't like their children be wild and uncontrolled like
many movie parents do.
9. Larry Miller's performance as her father was an amusing role.
10. The title.
TEN THINGS I HATED ABOUT THIS MOVIE
1. The character of Joey, along with the performance by Andrew Keegan.
2. The character of Cameron, along with the performance by Joseph Gordon-Levitt
3. The way it is predictable.
4. The way it tries to mix little kid comedy with teenager comedy.
5. The way it is so much like other teen comedies.
6. The character of Michael.  
7. Julia Stiles's character wasn't seen more.  She was a great character.
8. It is very similarly to She's All That.
9. The way it leaves so many untied knots.
10. The ending.

Title
Review for Notting Hill (1999)
http://members.aol.com/DeWyNGaLe
Julia Roberts is what I would call today's biggest female box office draw.  She
is best known for her romantic comedies, such as Pretty Woman and My Best
Friend's Wedding, and she just added another film to the ongoing list of great
films she has done.  In Notting Hill, Roberts plays Anna Scott, an extremely
popular and talked about actress.  In a way, Roberts is actually playing
herself her in Notting Hill.
William Thatcher, a resident of Notting Hill, London, is a bookstore worker who
is a huge fan of Anna Scott's.  He is faced with the reality he will never get
to meet her, but he continues his life anyway.  William's entire life and his
thoughts are changed one afternoon when Anna Scott herself enters his travel
book shop and browses around.  Little do the both of them know that Anna's
visiting that bookstore will turn into an ongoing relationship with William. 
The two continue to see each other, and they are both completely surprised and
happy with the relationship that has come to be.
>From here, we go into the regular, old romantic comedy theme.  The two are
split up, they get back together, there's a fight, etc.  The exact same formula
is used in virtually every romantic comedy, but in Notting Hill, the acting
from Julia Roberts and Hugh Grant made it so it didn't seem like the same old
thing.  Julia Roberts is terrific, as she is in all of her films.  Her
character is also quite a likable one.  She was a very interesting insight into
what it is actually like to be an actress that attracts so much attention.  We
got to learn that acting isn't all it is put up to be. Anna is played by Julia
with a lot of feeling and emotion, which really brought her character to life.
Hugh Grant has been around for awhile in show business, but he hasn't really
been in anything that will give him a wonderful name in moviegoer's minds. 
Notting Hill just did the trick for him.  Look for Hugh Grant to be seen in
many more movies after his terrific, realistic performance in Notting Hill.
There are two main problems present in Notting Hill which took away a lot from
the film as a whole.  One of those problems is the character of Spike, played
by Rhys Ifans, who is William's roommate.  The character is very annoying,
disgusting, un-funny, and his presence in the film almost made me want to walk
out.  Others in the theater laughed at his grossness, but I was petrified.  The
second main problem present in Notting Hill is the way it will use a character
for a laugh, and then throw them away like they were yesterday's newspaper.  We
get to see a character for about five seconds, and then they disappear after
they have tried made us laugh.  I don't like it when films use characters like
this for cheap laughs, and I rather see these characters more often in the
film, and to see them become more developed.  
Roberts and Grant weren't the only ones that gave outstanding performances. 
The supporting performances from actors added a lot to the film as well.  Gina
McKee, who played Bella, gave an extremely emotional performance.  Others who
gave great performances were Hugh Bonneville as Bernie, Emma Chambers as Honey,
and James Dreyfus as Max.  All of these characters are a part of William's
family, and all of their lives were changed by the meeting with Anna Scott.  
Julia Roberts and Hugh Grant go perfectly together as a romantic comedy couple.
 Their characters are both humorous, smart, likable, and on they are a lot of
fun to watch.  In many romantic comedies, the two main characters do not go
together very well on screen, but in Notting Hill, Roberts and Grant are
perfectly cast.  Although their relationship is often unbelievable, and much
like those of others in other romantic comedies, they are both very likable and
enjoyable.
Notting Hill has a great story.  It shows that your life can be changed in one
second, by something you never imagined would happen.  William's life was
completely changed by Anna Scott, and it wasn't because she was a huge actress,
but because of the person she was.  His family was also changed by the great
personality of Anna, and not because she was a huge, hyped actress.  I think
that the moral story here is very true and it should be learned by many of us
in today's world.
The Bottom Line- A realistic romantic comedy with a brain.  A huge brain.
